Cheers to happy and loyal audiences,
and kings to the brightness of your dawn.
Subsistence
(Well, maybe just Maggie does, and she might have just brought her hair along for the ride. I do not know for a fact that she consulted her hair.)
My attitude was that, if you knowingly go to a Jerry Sadowitz show, you cannot complain afterwards about being offended. It is a bit like letting your small child watch Doctor Who and then complaining afterwards that he or she shat behind the sofa with fear.
Make 'em go, oh
Private Outlet delivers into the following European countries: Metropolitan France, Germany, Austria, Belgium, Spain, Ireland, Italy, Luxemburg, The Netherlands, Portugal, The United Kingdom.
Lemon Shortbread Cookies (Adapted from "Tartine")
As if things couldn’t get any creepier for Evie, one afternoon while opening up the bar she sings at, she finds the body of Nick Stone stabbed to death in one of the booths. She can’t help but feel stunned and saddened as Nick had become a friend. He was a nice guy who was taken advantage of as a kid actor, lost most of his money and wound up an alcoholic with a bar. He was also the only guy who would give Evie a chance up on the stage, and she is grateful for that, even if his place isn’t exactly The House of Blues. Unlike Simone, Nick was willing to listen to Evie sing, respected her talent and wanted to give her opportunity. Simone is demanding and a diva with no interest in anyone but herself.
I’m not saying that this is bad, it’s just a shoddy job which could have been much more but which still entertains quite well. Truth be told, you’ve never heard of this because it’s nothing special and probably should have stayed back in 2001 and not arrived on my laptop screen thanks very much. I had a blast watching it but that was also partly due to the huge bag of Doritos I was eating. I love Doritos.
2 apologies
Radical jihadists are a threat to us how? How are they a threat to our “way of life?” How are they a threat to our nation as a whole? Who really hates us because we are free? Who really holds us in contempt for our ideals of liberty and freedom? The terrorists? The evil doers? Who really are the terrorists and evil doers?
“The new evangelization is a frame of mind, a courageous manner of acting and Christianity’s capacity to know how to read and interpret the new situations in human history which, in recent decades, have become the places to proclaim and witness to the Gospel….These sectors concern society, cultures, economics, civic life, and religion….
Stat-wise, Arcanine has one of the highest base stat totals (at 555), especially considering it’s not a legendary or pseudo-legendary Pokemon, and that it’s part of a 2-stage evolution. Its highest stat is in Attack, which is good to take advantage of Flare Blitz (though it’s an egg move), and Extreme Speed. Its Sp Attack is not bad either, so it can be a mixed attacker too.
22:00 – 23:30 Geck-O
For the outside earth is cold,---
Laura (4 years): Having worked up a sweat working in the yard, and en route to the shower, Dad stopped to give Laura a horseyback ride. Half-way across the living room floor she told him, “Dad, you smell like a real horse.” (#16)
In his concurrence, Justice Kennedy instructed courts to be cognizant of the nature of the patent being enforced and the economic function of the patent holder when applying the equitable factors. eBay, 126 S. Ct. at 1842 (Kennedy, J., concurring) (“When the patented invention is but a small component of the product the companies seek to produce and the threat of an injunction is employed simply for undue leverage in negotiations, legal damages may well be sufficient to compensate for the infringement and an injunction may not serve the public interest.”) . . . The right to exclude becomes more urgent when the product is the invention.
I hope that someday you will welcome my wish to say, Love,Doris. It has hurt so much not to be able to narrow our ideological gaps. You and my son love each another. I want to love you as well. Enough said tonight, I'm not all together.
4 ink bottles.
-Pencils
And besides...would this immaculate specimen hurt me?
OP: “Chase the world” by May’n – Jpop. Typical in sound, lyrically, and perhaps in animation. Good enough, at least.
Bill and Amy Albright aren’t thrilled with the thought of the animals coming back to Zanesville, either, but as long as the state steps its regulation of exotic animal owners, they don’t have a huge issue with it, they said.
Creative Charms Rhinestones.
The content would be based on both the practical training / briefings that I do with large companies on a regular basis, and on my academic teaching at Birkbeck, University of London, where I teach working postgraduate students about corporate responsibility for nine weeks a year, plus research supervision.
Most of us are so cavalier with the use of our time. We assume that we have plenty of time to waste.
paper: Georgia Pacific white cardstock, Pink Pirouette by SU
The design of your own Wedding Genealogy Chart that is customized to your event. Each chart details the relationships of the bride and groom to their various guests, calling out interesting connections and occasional little-known fact.Choose from three distinct design styles.
You gotta fill out your forms.
matter of fact.
Danny Simmons, Recovered believer, Costa Mesa, California
Now, we are all aware that, as of late, there have been four main candidates for the Republican presidential nomination: Mitt Romney, Rick Santorum, Ron Paul, and Ben Grimm.
How can I describe night diving to you when you haven’t done it? Even a brightly-lit day dive feels very much like being an interstellar explorer floating in your antigravity suit over an utterly alien world, breathing your own bottled air because the aliens’ atmosphere is deadly to humans. The lifeforms are at once oddly beautiful and extremely bizarre. They do unexpected things. They burst from their camouflaged hiding place right before your eyes, startling you. Fight or flight? Oh, ok, neither. He’s just zooming away because he was startled by my appearance. I can relax. Temporarily.
In Episodes 1-3, the Jedi’s greatest enemy are, therefore, themselves.
Saute onion in butter until it begins to brown. Quarter tomatoes and add to the pan, then add garlic. Add salt and pepper to taste, then stir in cooked pasta once tomatoes are shriveled. Top with black olives. Eat up!
still in the box of negatives.
at the market was so compelling you just
OU NOTES: Recorded by Wes M. from 3rd Row (artwork incorrectly states 6th row), slightly left of center aisle. Disc 2, Track 15 is incorrectly listed on artwork as "Sofa" (my mistake again).
Now, the one you've been waiting for...
And I’ll remember the good times we had.’
Because I slacked off all week, I made it up by trying to write one for each day's work.
Zucchini Slippers
Although there are inevitably some similarities with Horace McCoy’s depression-era classic They Shoot Horses Don’t They?, there is nothing as grimly deterministic in its social commentary here as we follow the shifting fortunes of the contestants. Though there are 16 competitors to begin with, right from the start all eyes are on the rivalry between reigning champion Captain Erskine Chadwick, who from his side bets stands to win a whopping £11,000, and the young pretender Charles Durrell. Their contest takes place in a privileged space on the internal track reserved for gentlemen, while on the outer track run all the others from the lower social classes – the most eccentric of which is the completely inexperienced Francis Mostyn whose motives for participating are a mystery. At the end of each day we are given a summary of everyone’s progress with a table of the miles and laps run. Lovesey spends quite a lot of time setting up the basic situation and all the characters so that sergeant Cribb only makes his appearance a third of the way in when Durrell dies, apparently of tetanus. He is a serious and intelligent man, not much interested in running as a sport and who proves to be a smart judge of character, changing interrogation technique depending on the person in question. Cribb’s deductions are always logical and plausible, though I’m still not entirely convinced about how fairly he solved the case (more about that below)
Magari tutti camminano.
Had to wait over an hour before she came, because she got all dolled up lololol. We went to Singapore Hot Wok for some food, I didn't order any because I had just eaten before I came out, but Siru brought me chopsticks anyway because she knows I'll still eat? True friend or what. Food was super delicious, almost died. I really want to go eat there again, they also serve kway teow, my favourite dish in the world I think!
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Synecdoche, New York
I have a dry sense of humor and will often gaze straight-faced after making a joke, though inside I’m laughing. I love to be near a person in companionable silence, but I also love a playful friend. I adore a quiet winter evening hugging a kitty, gush books and interrupt people in my excitement sometimes, become eye-lit in the face of history, and can seem very childlike and bubbly, often. I gush with sentimentality. I love a vibrant sunrise. I find it difficult to follow a schedule or be at all predictable, though I do like to control my own timetable, and thus despite myself I am fairly predictable. I don’t mind being alone, but I also love being with people. I’m a homebody — I love home, especially on a winter’s night when the whole world seems raven and cold, and I’m tucked in my lamplit nook. But having family there is more cozy to me than being alone. (I still don’t mind being alone though.) I adore my family and have a ravenous curiosity about my ancestors, especially here in Georgia. I’m INCREDIBLY independent. (I dislike being bossed. When people tell me what to do, I do the opposite whenever possible.) I’m often lost in deep thought, even when I appear to be listening. (I never mean to not listen!) I forget myself in daydreams. I dislike math, but I can do it if I’m taught. I LOVE science, history, astronomy, philosophy, grammar, etc. I’m not particularly tidy. I yearn to be calm, rational and focused, but spontaneity, sentimentality, “sensibility,” and blunt candor are my tried and true mainstays!
Cost
1 fight
Is it humanity’s destiny to be a broken record droning on for eternity?? Is this what we were created for?
HAPPY BIRTHDAY PRECIOUS GIRL!
She caused a fuss, and threatened to become a worse thorn in their sides than Biermann had ever been. By that time she was a well known performer, and the government kicked her out with, one suspects, a sigh of relief.
Children of Men. When I wrote that blog about the best movies of the “Aughts”, I proclaimed this one the best. It wasn’t nominated for Best Picture, which is a total joke. I can’t really even get into the many, many reasons. It’s got an intriguing story. Excellent performances. My favorite soundtrack of any movie ever. One of the most insane tracking shots ever filmed. Then a whole other insane tracking shot that would take the title if not for the first. It’s really got everything. It’s emotional, political, lyrical, fluid. To this day, I don’t understand how it wasn’t nominated. Until I get an answer, The Departed’s win gets a big fat asterisk.
juice of 3 lemons
It's 2:15 pm and OMG! Susan just asked Mel to drive! (She had asked Susan to teach her to safely drive the RV during this trip so she'd be able to drive it confidently in the future...but NOW?!!!)
So here is where Accountable Kids comes in. I have to say, the first I came across this program, I thought it was ridiculously expensive. When I realized I was failing miserably at my goal, I decided having a tool to effectively help me instill the character traits I want in my kids was worth the price. Also, there are ways to get discounts, one of which is writing a review for the program. So here it is.
I can be pretty hard on myself. Why can’t I step on the scale and simply record a number in my head without the inner monologue about baby weight and not enough “me” time to work on it? Why do I even need to step on the scale at all? No reason really, other than to set the tone of my day: winning or defeated? Depends on the number. But, in the end, that’s all in my head. THAT is self-judgement and it isn’t making me happy.
Shines on our loneliness
Direct Lift is America’s leading hobbyist lift brand. The company offers a variety of competitively priced car, truck and motorcycle lifts for the home enthusiast, hobbyist, restoration facility or professional mechanic.
so that has left us local ladies really craving some Scrappy Goodness...
Tina Rath – Miss Massingbird And The Vampire
Her statement hit the top Baloney Scale so far this month.
The fact of the matter is that men can be infertile and not just women. A woman may be fertile whilst the man is infertile. Men’s ego can be so huge that they would not want to seek medical health.
Finally, relief was mine…….. for the moment.
You will definitely fall in love with the simplicity of this utility. Now you are not constrained to download just one file at a time, now you can download upto 6 files simultaneously. The app now has a proper history management feature too.
“Opportunity of a lifetime” is an absolute understatement when describing the basket of goodies awarded to recipients of the Kopf Scholarship. First of all, to be quite honest, the “opportunity” is really only available to the most passionate, studious, and driven students amongst us. For that group of students, winning becomes the challenge of a lifetime. And, once the winners are chosen, it becomes the reward of a lifetime.
Hope for Horses
Recipe to make this:
So, what are you doing to celebrate the birthday of Thomas Jefferson on April 13?
physics.
And their new friends.
The unyoked humour of your idleness:
Captions for The New Yorker image presented below are due TONIGHT before midnight.
So…I have a heck of a long way to go in order to reach my weight loss goal. I don’t really post about it because I’m pretty ashamed of how much weight I’ve gained. But…I think I need to share this just so that I remember where I came from and remind myself of where I want to be.
Preheat your oven to 400 degrees. Grease a baking dish and set your cleaned and cored peppers inside of it. Use balls of tinfoil to prop them up if you have trouble making them sit correctly.
They all want curls
Hope y'all had a good week!
- Trust supplies and involve them early
ON LEAVE.
PS: This is my latest bit of decoration in my house. It encourages me not to take things quite so seriously…
In the early morning gathered,
02 - I Must Have That Man
In December 2010, Congress repealed the “Don’t Ask Don’t Tell” policy established by President Clinton that allowed homosexuals to remain in the military on the condition they not make a public issue of their sexual lifestyle.
Second, I accidentally hit “Publish” on a draft post that I started on Thursday. I had numerous people tell me that they couldn’t see my new post…well that’s because I deleted it right after accidentally posting it. Psych! Sorry guys and gals, my bad. I was tired and trying to work on my iPad, fumbling around with my fingers. Excuses, excuses, I know.
So many updates are all about Emmett, solely because that is my life these days. I love Sir Cheeks, but he is a time-consuming little man. Babies! They cry for a bottle and then barf it all over you! This is my life. Feed the bean, wipe spit-up off of him and me.... lather, rinse, repeat.
Plus I can’t put into words the most wonderful feeling of driving on a clear, warm summer’s night with the roof down, stars in the sky, and a warm breeze flowing around your face and body. I don’t think driving gets any better than that.
What relief then to finally discover our new neighbour was to be a boulangerie. Sure, there are already three boulangeries within stumbling distance of our place, but none of them seemed to produce the perfect baguette. And so it was with no small amount of delight that we discovered the new bakery was to be an outlet of the mildly famous "Gana" collection of boulangeries.
The noisy chattering birds
And an army of staff in equal number from the local school in our catchment area.
Let’s be honest, dogs are a lot more work than many other types of pet. They aren’t as independent as cats and can get into a lot more things around the house. If you’re family wants an animal but doesn’t have the time to devote to a dog or cat, consider a hamster or something else that can be kept in a cage. Also, if you don’t want to deal with the constant cleaning that can come with cat and dog hair, maybe an animal that’s contained in a cage is a better choice for you.
Experience is the highest form – the only true form – of empiricism.
Stiegl
i believe in God and i have faith in his direction
Crack Comics 46 (Jan 1947)
million which they collected
I am at home. Alone. There is no one else to exert their 4-year old dictatorship over the television programing. I am hit with the sudden urge to watch any of the six Star Wars films.
(Note his urbane use of adjectives such as “existential” and “ambient” and “responsorial.” Oooo – he must have a PhD!). Yes, Sir Kimball does have a point. In an increasingly globalized world, the literary community is no longer contained within nations, per se. Rather, in this flat world that is becoming more fenceless day-by-day, the ”shared cultural assumptions” of the USA are crumbling. Agreed.
Hi everyone! Well I start my final 4 week teaching practical placement on Monday, and I just can't wait!! I have been placed with a Grade 3 class at a local girls' private school, so I consider myself very lucky that I have managed to avoid having to travel away from our town and my family!
Traveling by plane this summer? Check out all this great information about flying with your child with special needs. Friendship Circle Blog
Now we’re swimming in bubble, Styrofoam, and cardboard unpacking our goods like children on Christmas! The empty nooks and crannies in the store are filling up once again, and we’re just about ready to share with you our labor of love.
The degree of devotion required of wolverine biologists in the service of gaining knowledge would put the most pious of religious adherents to shame. En route to Montana along the deserted dead-of-night roads, Jason told stories of his previous years directing field operations for the Absaroka-Beartooth Project – tales of crossing Yellowstone on snowmobile to reach a capture site while the roads were closed, performing the collaring operation, and then turning around and snowmobiling back, narrowly avoiding collisions with bison and wolves in the dark; tales of six-hour searches for dens in icy sleet with no real clue where the den might be (they found it); tales of sticking his head into dens without any assurance that the mother wolverine wasn’t inside (she was); tales of broken ribs in snowmobile maintenance mishaps; many, many tales of having to sacrifice time with his family in order to be in the field doing things that no one else was able to do, so that we might learn what a wolverine was eating, or whether or not she was denning.
The scenes include reservoirs, construction at a seaport, and industrial facilities. The photographs are interesting not only for their historic quality but also the beauty of their composition.
Anyway, CPT's national vehicle is a combo of a bulldozer and a train! Can you imagine what he did to my poor gondola! LOL. Needless to say, that's where the contention came from. Anyway, that's what had happened.
I could sleep by a sled.
JS - So it could be done. Any club, Dunfermline, Kilmarnock, Dundee United, could wash their debts off tomorrow and they could be back in the SPL as a newco next season?
This was badness. I knew that either one of us sacrificing something that is important is not what our relationship is about, nor what either of us wants.
During his announcement, Herman Cain continued to deny any misconduct on his part. He said, “These false and untrue allegations continue to be spinned in the media, and in the court of public opinion so as to create a cloud of doubt over me and this campaign and my family. That spin hurts. It hurts my wife. It hurts my family. It hurts me. And it hurts the American people, because you are being denied solutions to our problems.” Cain then said, “I am not going to be silenced and I am not going away.” Immediately thereafter however, Herman Cain was silent and then he went away.
Adon is now 16 months old and STILL NOT WALKING!!! He has been such a sufficient and FAST crawler that I fear he doesn't see the need to walk. But, as I've been comforted by many, he will eventually walk and has already taken several steps on his own. He's a big momma's boy and LOVES to follow his big brother Kai and play with everything and anything that he touches. He is such a happy-spunky kid and we all are having a blast watching him become his own little personality.
Today, though, I feel like we have earned a tiny win. It is one of about a bazillion wins that are necessary in his lifetime, but it is one. It is partially won. We kind of know, a sort of something that might just work for us.
I’d love to show you why you
Chuffed = Not to be confused with Chuffed as in the say the noise of an engine chuffing alone. Chuffed = happy = Pleased. Example: I was really chuffed when I got my test results and they were negative, had a scare after that night at the club!
"Because they're fun! Soft, warm, felt-y fun!!"
This plan for food combining is relatively simple and follows eating in a specific order for satisfactory digestion. This does not mean that all of these categories of foods should be eaten in the same meal; it means that the categories should be eaten in a specific sequence. The best-digested meals are in fact very simple ones, including a maximum of three foods per meal.
“To you, contessa.”
Toward the end of the game, the suspense finally got the best of the Torhans. Ry told the man, “We know you’re somebody, but we’re not sure who.”
Congratulations, Mr. President. You have killed innocent civilians because of your arrogance and self-serving dick-sucking. You did this. That blood is on your head, sir. If you would have stayed home, and not tried to be macho, those people would be alive today. Luckily, you have your State-run media to cover for you, as always. But not all of us in America are half as stupid as you think. Some of us are taking notes.
National Eggs Benedict Day will be celebrated on April 16th this year . In honor of this classic I decide to make this delicious breakfast dish for our supper tonight. Lightly toasted English muffins, Canadian bacon and poached eggs all topped off with a creamy smooth, buttery Hollandaise Sauce. From start to finish this dish is simple and quick. It is basically an assembled dish with the Hollandaise Sauce being the only thing that took a few minutes. I used Ina Garten's recipe for the creamy sauce and as usual her recipe did not let me down.
Me: “What?”
While I was busy looking at all the flora, and probably walking funnily slow, I realised that I had bumped into somebody. It startled me and I started apologising even before I looked at them. It was a 2/3year old boy. Luckily he did not get hurt. The mother laughed at me and said like she would talk to a child, “It is not all your fault dear. Little Henry was as lost in looking at the nice plants as you. Aren’t they pretty?”.
"He that is of the opinion money will do everything may well be suspected of doing everything for money" - Benjamin Franklin
It looks very similar to other plants which are starting to grow at this time of the year, including Lilly of the Valley, which is toxic. When rubbed, the leaves give off a pungent garlic or chive smell which helps in case of uncertainly.
I'm off tonight to see my other brother's band play for the first time. They've been getting all these rockstar gigs, and I haven't had an opportunity to see him strut his stuff. So I'll be getting ready for a night on the town and preparing for a huge long weekend tonight. We've got Chinese New Year celebrations, dinners, parties and I'm even holding a stall at the Camberwell market on Sunday in my ongoing attempts to purge. So If you don't see me this weekend, just picture me sleeping, exhausted in a pile of clothes.
This torte is even more fudgy and delicious after a night in the refrigerator, but the masses are likely clamoring for their cake, so feel free to serve it up right away with strawberries and/or crème fraîche.
And even though it kind of looks like everything is in the "pink" theme, we don't actually know the gender of the baby. Pink might not be a manly colour, but I figure that if I am getting good enough deals on a few used pink items (namely the Bumboo Seat) before baby arrives, and he's a ... him, he'll be small enough that he won't know the difference, and I'll be so happy about the money I saved, it won't matter to much :) The other projects I'm working on are much more gender neutral. Its just that Sarah gave me the girl Alphabet Soup cards, so really, what was I to do?
"Been busy mate. Just getting my head together ya know? Having a mental clear out and forgetting things, starting from scratch, again!"
....this capture is based off of a memory....sweet smiles....sweet whispers... the joy of new Stories.... ones come to light I guess you could say:)
But here’s what has the Auburn posters’ panties in a wad – dancing on the sidelines.
What did you think of these weeks mood board? Which room would you like to see next week?
I tried like many of you today to enter that Dr.Oz giveaway for Nike shoes.I am STILL trying but the page will not load because it is temp.down.I know lots of you feel my disappointment.I was so hoping to win some shoes for my husband but it looks as though their won't be any shoes for us.
Leonard M. Castrianno, 30, New York, N.Y.
Have any of you ever been to Washington D.C.?
"Brave" judge frees so called "Michigan Militia" - Says not liking cops "doesn’t amount to a conspiracy to rebel against the government"
But that doesn't make me feel any better about not being there for him, holding his hand, trying to keep him from worrying too much.
Evening: Cultural Event
So runs my dream: but what am I?
Blah, blah, blah. Life, school, crap. I finally managed to get the kids into the police station just this past Wednesday. They looked everything up on a central computer--my status, kids' status, addresses, fødselsnummer (basically a Social Security number)--everything. They took pictures right there. We were in and out in less than 15 minutes. When I asked how long it would take to process the actual passports, she told me, "We guarantee them within 10 days."
I have now become so distracted by my shiny new toy that I've forgotten what I was going to say about my knitting, so let's be brief. This weekend we had Christmas again with Martin's family, and I'd knitted some presents for his parents.
Pigs and piggies pink
“Oh no…no way…I’m not sharing this feast with you.”
Nasturtiums have also been planted all over, and will be used as companion planting later in the season.
I think travel agents are extremely useful and can really help take the stress out of vacation planning...for some people. I thoroughly enjoy the planning and researching phase of any trip, not just Disney World. I like bargain hunting. I like searching and finding just the right hotel or resort. I really just enjoy it.
I’m posting this very late . . . in the wee hours when judgment fails, you know, a risky time. Will I still like this in the morning? Let me know what you think.
I wanted to adopt a ton of them. I wanted to go there. I wanted to help.
The effects of this system on Sarawak’s environment and rural society have been transformative. Though Taib recently reiterated his claim that primary forest cover is at 70%, satellite images (pictured) or a flight over Sarawak’s hinterland show this to be patently false. Independent estimates put its primary forest cover at under 10%, in line with the prescient warnings the ITTO gave Taib in 1990 7 8. Yet the depletion of forests did not put an end to land seizures, which were then aimed at conversion into vast oil palm plantations, owned and operated by the very same companies (now international conglomerates) who made their fortunes in the timber boom. With international demand continuing to rise, the government plans to convert a whopping 2 million hectares into oil palm estates by 2020, with much of it on ‘idle’ native land9.
This is a trying time but I have no doubt that their love for each other will remain steadfast as it has always been. I understand Nanay’s advice on marriage. I felt it from Tatay’s patience with her. I saw it in how Tatay did her bidding. I heard it from their giggles at night.
I somehow managed to get my binding sewn on, can you believe it? Can't wait to finish this up! I'm looking forward to some quality couch time with this little quilt.
Yours truly-the nannyknowitall
clarified as well. I think I'll make room and get it in a keg right away.
First, I'd like to clarify that I try to avoid thinking and speaking in "shoulds." If my post gave the impression that I think people should dress according to societal norms of what constitutes "professional," I apologize. I was just trying to talk about my own relationship to "professional" dressing. Maggie certainly sensed, though, that I do wish more people were willing to acknowledge that how you dress your body matters. In our About the Blog page, we quote Tim Gunn, who has said "I believe in the semiotics of clothes: the clothes we wear send a message about how we're perceived. Accordingly, it's important that we each accept responsibility for how we present ourselves to the world." I'd like to invite you all to take a look at that page, especially those of you who are newer readers of the blog, because that's where we've tried to explain what we imagine as the purpose of our blog. I'd also like to encourage you to visit (or re-visit) my Henry James Textual Analysis post, in which I wrote a little bit more about my own conception of how and why language matters as a parallel to how and why dressing matters.
Some of the cons were that the watercolor seemed to have less depth, and the washes seemed more flat. Also, I was unable to lift highlights out with clean water, like I do with regular watercolor paper. I think I will try hot press watercolor paper at some point, as it will probably have the same texture as this paper, and I can buy it in a block, which is what I prefer. Watercolor paper comes in different textures: rough, coldpress, and hotpress. Coldpress had a medium texture and is more absorbant than hotpress.
Another episode ends similarly, when one of Garrow's infants is kidnapped (I am not making this up) by Chinese gangs. Three days later, Yoda, using his extensive network of the Chinese underworld, retrieves the child.
Well, Punxsutawney Phil has predicted 6 more weeks of winter...but lately it has been feeling more like spring! Yesterday it was over 60 degrees out! I know that everyone in my office was suffering from Spring Fever yesterday, even though its only the beginning of February. Ed keeps warning me that we should brace ourselves for a massive snowfall soon, but so far we have only seen about 2" total this winter, which is unusual.
Secondly, I did appreciate the depth and complexity of this secondary world, with its long and bloody history, of vampires, vampire hunters and humans. It's not without flaw or contradiction and, in many ways, it seems amoral, but it has its poignancy and true emotion as well. A great many ins and outs and subtleties play through it and it's rather fascinating to follow them around to find out yet another secret. Actually, as more is revealed, more becomes tidy and holds together with the big linchpin to the whole thing being Kaname, not the youthful Kaname Kuran everyone thinks he is but the endlessly old Kaname who was as much a factor in the decline of vampires' ascendency as he was the creation of the vampire hunters.
The first thought of any wannabe photographer is the choice of his phoographic equipment, because the question "which camera should i buy?" it's one of the Existential doubts that never leave you.
But she did not tell me what to do when you meet yourself, a complete stranger
All Air Travel
Upon finding an old family account of her great great grandmother, Anne Eliza Wolcott Dewey, Ms. Grimes discovered that this ancestor had lived in Brooklyn when it was a small but rapidly growing village clustered around the Fulton Ferry landing in the 1820s and 30s. She lived at 11 Prospect St., which no longer exists. Her mother (Ms. Grimes' great great great grandmother) opened a school for young ladies on Prospect Street, where "for four dollars per quarter, she was ready to teach spelling, reading, writing, and sewing."
she always is
Now, if you'll excuse me, I need to get back to my addiction.
Want to be a guest blogger for Isle of Capri Casino Hotel Boonville and Farmer’s Pick Buffet? If so, tell us why you should win and show off your writing skills! Email us at isleofcapribv@islecorp.com by May 6 and let us know why we should pick you.
Jon L. Albert, 46, Upper Nyack, N.Y.
The institution of marriage was started with an objective that a man and a woman might learn how to love, and in loving know "Joy"....
I had no idea what I was doing.
Some of these passages tell us what we are TO DO with one another—teach, be humble, encourage, show hospitality, etc. And some of these texts warn us what NOT to do with one another—do not lie, do not bite and devour, stop passing judgment, etc. What these verses should tell us is that there is no way to live the Christian faith PRIVATELY. God made us for community and fellowship. He made us for accountability and worship. He did not make us to stay at home and watch religious TV and think that our personal and private religion” is “Christian” in the Biblical sense of that term
19th December - Sunday
Here in Siem Reap, as usual we’ve had most of our meals at the Hawaii Restaurant on Wat Bo Road, where the food is good, the service always friendly, and the kids can play pool. As usual, they beat me every game. My friend So Pengthai, a tour guide, has been busy with clients most of the week, but we met for dinner one night. He brought along his 2-year-old daughter. His wife has to stay home and take care of their newest arrival: a son that was born two weeks ago! Speaking of new events, my friend Rong, who works at the Siem Reap Airport, also met us for dinner one night and brought something new of his own: the young woman he married three weeks ago! And to top off the list of things going on, So Pengthai is headed to Phnom Penh next week to apply for a visa at the US Embassy. His tour company wants to send him to a training course in Cleveland (Cleveland?! Yes, that’s the plan!) in late April. Needless to say, he’s quite excited, but also a bit reluctant to leave his wife and newborn son for the six weeks that the course will take.
Whether it was in grateful recollection of my cigar case, or because there was no one else to talk to, I cannot say, but he touched his hat and wished me good morning. I immediately, and after the approved English fashion, commented on the state of the weather.
~ Camping equipment for impromptu adventures
This one is not sterile. This one is... woogly.
And frost and snow bedecked outside
Or did it end once you came?
In the afternoon I spent more time with my sister and mom exploring Hallowell and the evening was filled with mom's good cooking. We headed to bed early and left in the morning for one more adventure. Natasha had asked Chris to read some of his poetry for possible voice-overs in a film that is being made about the Occupy movement here in Maine. After, we were on the road with a pottery drop-off for Ironbound Gallery in Camden (they plan to open mid May!) and some grocery shopping.
If you are new to Copic Markers and have been looking around for tutorials on how best to use them, you may have found that some people start with their darkest colour first and others start with their lightest. There is no right or wrong way as each person will do what is best for them - however, the girls on on the Copic Design Team and all Regional Instructors start with their lightest first.
What if she can see within the darkness? What if she gets used to the darkness of the cosmos and she moves through it without light? The fear departs, the life returns as she chooses to see the light that exists inside her, to feel its warmth and know that she is not alone, despite the dense darkness that covers the known cosmos.
I’ve been ready, been waiting
Bowing in Japan is traditional, it is the equivalent (and a bit more) of shaking hands, you cannot get through the day without bowing, you even find yourself doing it when talking on the phone. For instance, you know when a car stops at a zebra crossing to let you cross, halfway across you give a little wave to acknowledge the driver to say ‘thanks for stopping’* In Japan, you do a little semi-turn towards the driver and a little bow, in fact I had to train myself out of it when I returned, in case people thought I was being rude and ignoring them. The waitress bows when giving you the bill, you bow when giving her the money, it is politeness and Japan is all about being polite.
Here's the before pictures, how it's been, pretty much untouched for a year and a half.About half of the stuff is staying in the room, because there is no where to put it, and Garrett doesn't need THAT big of a play space. Although, now that I've finished the changes, he has enough stuff to easily fill the room. The other half of the stuff is spread throughout the house. We have a really wide hallway, so the big black shelf is in the hall. The table and two chairs fit nicely in the guest bedroom, and the papazan is in the odd space/'tiny room' at the end of the hall, where I originally thought I could get Garrett to play. But he's not a fan at being at the end of a long hallway, with bad lighting, all by himself. I don't blame him. This space also stores clothes that the kids have outgrown, blankets, more books and toys that we will rotate in and out to keep things interesting.His new playroom has been usable for a few days now, and so far he's enjoying it. And Paul and I are enjoying that we have a convenient, well organized space to keep all his stuff. He still brings things from the room and leaves toys/magnets/books all over the house, but it's easier to clean up now and everything has a place.
Sing with me... "bluuuuuue mooooon... you saw me standing alooooone... without a dream in my heeaaarrrrt... without a love of my ooooowwwwnnnnnn...."
There are 12 constellation and 9 arc segments. 9 times 12 equal 108. The 9 planets travelling through the 12 signs constitute the whole of existence. 9 x 12 = 108. The 27 nakshatras or lunar constellations spread over the 4 elements – fire, earth, air, water or the 4 directions – north, south, east, and west. This also constitutes the whole of existence. 27 x 4 = 108.
The taste hits hard and strong with a jab of intense and cloudy booze sting, slowly calms into a peppery tone from the hops and then, out of nowhere, after the swallow there's this really nice fruity burst that erupts. I didn't expect that but it kind of made me feel giggly. Aftertaste after the first few gulps is a very, very light dust of grass. As I keep on drinking that immediate sweetness is still there and the taste is pretty damn good. One third of the way through and as I stop to take short pauses, the taste of that Belgian yeast starts to slowly creep in and intensify with each gulp. Interesting. I couldn't smell it or taste it at first, but I guess its characteristics are so embedded in this strange way that it grows and expands.
A little bit of elicitation and refining the context by asking this question helped me convince them the statement was unreal. And this elicitation of the fact that we’re talking about the past and we¡re talking about an unreal situation made eliciting the name of the structure to the top of the handout easy peasy – Unreal Past Conditions.
Why? Because I immediately spotted Queen Bee herself, draped all over that awful Drew Dunn. In a pink ballgown, Ella was way overdressed – after all, the dress code was “semi-formal” – and looked like either an obnoxious fairy princess or, with her bouffant hairdo, a luscious piece of cotton candy. As she gave me a cutesy little wave, beauty-pageant style, I was leaning more towards the obnoxious fairy princess. All she needed to complete the look was a tiara.
Anaya said that in nearly two weeks of visiting Indian reservations, indigenous communities in Alaska and Hawaii, and Native Americans now living in cities, he encountered people who suffered a history of dispossession of their lands and resources, the breakdown of their societies and "numerous instances of outright brutality, all grounded on racial discrimination".
Poems published in books or on the Internet (including Facebook and other on-line social networks) are not eligible. If your poem has been published in a periodical, you may submit it provided that you retain copyright, but please include publication data.
It was here your correspondent found him one sunny afternoon recently in the very attitude of the picture. Mr. Campbell has lived in this house seventy-two years.
on the scalp or neck or arm.
Score: Carrie-Ann=7, Len=7, Bruno=7 for a total of 21 and a grand total of 62
Dom Su wrote on Facebook:
These birds are such machinery:
There are at least two kinds of oak growing in this wood. The pleasing scalloped outline of leaves of the native oak, Quercus robur, is instantly recognisable. But here amongst those is a larger, spikier leaf: an oak, I’m sure, but not a native. I don’t know – there is no-one now on the estate whom I could ask – but I think this is the leaf of the North American Nuttall oak (Quercus nutallii). If anyone knows better, I’d love to be told.
Helene looked up at the manager, standing a few feet away with his arms crossing, shaking his head in disgust. Helene smirked and mouthed “asshole” at him. She lowered her voice.
A hooker comes along and says to him, "Like to come home with me, buddy?"
93) I think I can die happy now, ‘cause I’ve just seen a piece of heaven.
The group's second album, BONE PALACE BALLET -- originally released in September of 2007 -- debuted at #5 on Billboard's Top 200 Album Chart. The new version -- which the group headed back into the studio with producer Casey Bates to complete -- features four new songs as well as two acoustic versions of "I Didn't Say I Was Powerful, I Said I Was A Wizard" and "A Letter From Janelle," that have never been released to the public.
4. “No Child Left Behind” and “Race to the Top.” The corporatocracy has figured out a way to make our already authoritarian schools even more authoritarian. Democrat-Republican bipartisanship has resulted in wars in Afghanistan and Iraq, NAFTA, the PATRIOT Act, the War on Drugs, the Wall Street bailout, and educational policies such as “No Child Left Behind” and “Race to the Top.” These policies are essentially standardized-testing tyranny that creates fear, which is antithetical to education for a democratic society. Fear forces students and teachers to constantly focus on the demands of test creators; it crushes curiosity, critical thinking, questioning authority, and challenging and resisting illegitimate authority. In a more democratic and less authoritarian society, one would evaluate the effectiveness of a teacher not by corporatocracy-sanctioned standardized tests but by asking students, parents, and a community if a teacher is inspiring students to be more curious, to read more, to learn independently, to enjoy thinking critically, to question authorities, and to challenge illegitimate authorities.
berries/
Twisted Metal by Tony Ballantyne - I'm a sucker for robot characters, but few authors seem to want to tread upon the ground that Issac Asimov developed so well with I, Robot. Ballantyne's takes it up a level with the development of an entire planet solely populated with robots of various factions. The most interesting aspects was how each city/faction of robots differ in not only there body types, but also their personalities. The story is clunky in places as the points of view switch up, but once you get the patterns down everything coalesces. Recommended and I'm eager for the next volume Blood and Chrome.
Regular readers of this blog may remember that I lost all of my jpeg files last November when my external hard drive crashed. I wrote about it {here}, if you care to read. It’s short and sad. In early December, I took the device to one of the best computer experts in our area who, after several weeks, informed me that his staff could get nothing from it. I was sad, but I’m almost embarrassed to say it’s been sitting there ever since because I just couldn’t bring myself to go get it. Pretty lame, I know.
Here are a few of my favorite knitted dishcloth knitted washcloth patterns.
In other words, the convicted infringer is considered to be comparable to a licensee with very low credit worthiness and the poorest payment record you can imagine in a case where the no uncertainty with regard to the validity of the right or with regard to the infringement exists. In the case at issue, the court found an increment of 66% over the usual royalties in the technical field to be reasonable.
You can enter more than once. A winner will be chosen from the Random Drawing for week #6 challenge and will be announced Friday February 24th. This winner will win a small Punch a Bunch Punch. The winner will also be entered in the end of the year $100 gift certificate drawing.
I saw one of these top note dressers on someone's blog (I'm so sorry, but I can't remember where I first saw this) and have since seen them on several other blogs. When I planned my Big Shot class for last week, I knew that I would have to reproduce that dresser as a sample. Isn't it just precious?
She's got me. She really has. And H. He has been magnificent. He has been caring. We both have.
2 Peter 2:1-3
Two longtime childhood friends—and @jackfrombklyn, for some reason—have the privilege of calling me Née. If it’s said condescendingly, I will secretly be plotting out ways to trip you up with some jump rope and then shake the end of my pigtail in your ear.
I love the fact that we had a little girl and my mate said that we now have a Gentlemens family of a Boy and Girl. Not heard that saying but I like it.
Sounds of light, stay in her keeping
One's place in the world as a person of wealth looks different, however, if the disproportionate accumulation of money is seen as largely the result of chance. Of course, I agree that hard work ought to be rewarded. But good luck in timing, chance connections, and accidents of birth and thus of access to education often multiply the wages of hard work manyfold. The difference in the talent of the world's finest violinist and it's 50th ranked violinist can't be as great as the difference in their compensation would suggest. The income differential between the top 100 money managers and manager number 1,000 may be entirely due to chance: lucky guesses, connections to wealthy investors, unexpected government interventions in markets and so on.
I got to musing on this particular question after reading an interview in the Guardian with both Erica Jong–author, writer, sexual revolutionary and coiner of the term “zipless f*ck”–and her daughter Molly Jong-Fast, a self-described prude. Who else but the daughter of Erica Jong would choose that word, of all words, to describe herself?
Ex Libris (Anne Fadiman)
We went to Haarlem for the day and the information centre suggested the self guided walking tour. Armed with a brochure and a map we set off from the Grote Markt, the original centre of the city of Haarlem. The city is located 20 kilometres from Amsterdam on the river Spaarne, and has a rich history back to pre medieval times.
This card is for the new sketch at The Outlawz. It has Mimi in the Rain from DeNami Design with one of the Friendly Advice stamps by Inkadinkado. The super bright paper is from Echo Park's Summer Days.
It's a mad film, but its intense emotions are carefully controlled within a very rigid and powerful aesthetic framework. These oversized emotions, these bold feelings and words freighted with meaning, are straining against the boundaries of the Academy ratio frame, against the very form of the film which seeks, in vain, to hem them in. This tension is embodied in the jarring leaps between natural splendor and studio artificiality, necessitated at least in part by star Joan Crawford, a solidly artificial actress who refused to be filmed in closeup in nature. That might be a crippling limitation for a Western, except that Ray makes it into a weird virtue, adding to the impression that Vienna is always in control while Emma spirals into deranged hysteria. Vienna's saloon is cool and clean, almost clinical, its color scheme a uniform reddish brown, its large, high-ceilinged rooms almost always empty. When Vienna is filmed in closeups, they're glossy, beautiful images, the light shining almost entirely on her face so that her head glows like a spotlight in the dark void around her, the shadows falling so closely around her face that at times, when she moves even slightly, the lower or upper portion of her face melts into the shadowy surroundings.
See deep now
I also still have my favourite of all times: my Nikon F4, later joined by a second one, but that one now drains the batteries!
me a couple of weeks ago if I could use my camera to
Do you know what your greatest marketing assets are? Here’s a hint: It’s got nothing to do with a killer logo or a great web site. Two of the greatest marketing assets you posses can make all the difference in your results.
Deuteronomy 5:8-9 (King James Version) 8 Thou shalt not make thee any graven image, or any likeness of any thing that is in heaven above, or that is in the earth beneath, or that is in the waters beneath the earth: 9 Thou shalt not bow down thyself unto them, nor serve them: for I the LORD thy God am a jealous God, visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children unto the third and fourth generation of them that hate him.
....or the interwebs, or to see my niece....ugh!!!!!
Though I've loved you for a million years,
could very well have to do with
Did any of the true believers have a problem with the door being that wide open? Absolutely not! We loved it. How wonderful! But there came a day, the 17th day of the 2nd month, which was May 21, 2011, wherein God shut the door to heaven!
The WORD says… The Lord of Hosts deserves the best (Malachi 1).
- not being careless, it means being free
The editor of Commentary, John Podhoretz, offered an explanation on his magazine’s blog. “American liberals,” he wrote, “know their own language, but they don’t know the language of their ideological and partisan opposite numbers. ... Conservatives speak liberal, but for liberals in the United States, conservatism might as well be Esperanto.”
Cream the butter and the sugar and vanilla sugar, then add bit by bit the ground almonds, flour, baking powder and eggs.
Source: Indiana’s News Center
As with most Franco films, there are a couple of scenes that really do linger in the memory: the De Franval's first murder is captured on camera as a young model (Alice Arno) takes part in a photo shoot that will culminate in her death. It's here that Eugenie makes her killer's debut, taking the part of make-up artist, producer and executioner. As Albert's camera approaches a frenzied climax, Bruno Nicolai's lyrical score suddenly mutates into disorientating free-form jazz; a head-spinning combination that will surely wipe the smile off the face of any Franco detractor. The second inspired set-piece occurs when the De Franval's develop a taste for hitchhikers; this time, it's Greta Schmidt (playing terminal chatterbox Kitty) who joins the ranks of Franco's 'slaughtered broads', taking centre-stage in a party game that must figure as one of Franco's most erotic creations. The man himself also plays a significant part in front of the camera, emerging as a directorial detective who loathes and admires his quarry.
Here's the tree, loaded down. I took this picture mainly because I know next year's paper and piles will be very different. This probably looks like a ridiculous amount of stuff, but when you divide it between 9 people, it's not as gluttonous as it looks!
Moving on !!! Lily did great. She did more than great- she was fantastic. She never ever cried, which was a complete miracle. This is the little girl who nurses faithfully at five or six in the morning every morning to go back to sleep. And wants to nurse again when she wakes up. But she just sat on the hospital bed or on our laps or on a blanket we spread out on the floor, playing, chattering, reading books, playing on Daddy's iPad, Mama's phone, etc. right up until her surgery. Nurses kept stopping by and peeking in to see the little pixie in her gown, and everyone kept oohing and aahing over how tiny she and cute she was. It helps that my two oldest sons are EKG techs at our hospital, and they are DOTED ON by every nurse in that place. Literally, every time we've been at the hospital, or met any staff, without fail they always tell us how much they love our boys, and what a great job we've done raising them. It really does make a mama proud to hear that kind of thing.
McCoy's - Cask Night
He has not talked about it much over the holidays. No desire to try on the school uniform. A 'not happy Jan' face when we bought the school shoes. No particular interest to identify an A from a B from a C. (His favourite letter is still L. I suspect it always will be.)
The number of photographers who focus soley on abstraction of architecture or it forms a large part of thier body of work could be counter on one hand and include Judith Turner (forth image), Helene Binet (fifth image), Roland Fischer (third image) and to a lesser extent Michael Wolf (first image) & Natalia Andrianova (second image).
The interface takes some getting used to; I was playing like a retard for the first 2 games. But now that I have the hang of it, I have a feeling that my actual game is going to be closed and never used.
The rice sizzled and hissed. After the dizziness passed, Rainer took the bowl of eggs and swirled them into the rice. He stirred quickly to break up the eggs into thin sheets and rags, stark against the pepper flakes. Leaving the mess to cook briefly, he swabbed out the bowl with a banana leaf and some water. The monks had given him one bowl, and he had not yet mastered it for his meals. He shook the contents of the pan into the bowl and turned off the burners. The tea kettle he emptied into a waiting mug. The small amount of tea leaves in the mug swirled around as if in a miniature storm. The aroma of jasmine and eggs filled the air, and Rainer found himself salivating in spite of the nausea he felt.
When we took her to the hospital for X-rays, she saw the same doctor who treated me last week for my collar bone. She recognized me, and a few jokes were thrown around about how my family was single-handedly keeping the hospital in business. Ha ha, very funny. Grrrrrr. :)
At first, only two arrived, but upon giving the ‘rallying call’, another two members quickly appeared, and the raucous sounds made as they tried to intimidate the feeding lions was something I wont forget in a hurry! The hyenas sneakily ran in and tried to bite the lions tail, but the mere presence of the young male was enough to keep them at bay! Had it just been the lioness, they would no doubt have stolen the kill and chased her off.
Charlie and Emily got married and stay in London. Besides Raymond is a sort of nowhere man who is teaching English in Spain as of now.
Even to the last drop I drain now the hoppy bitterness and surprise is the same as the first mouthfull.
Live in today, my fellow writers. Live and be happy right now.
Here is an interesting snippet from The Week magazine’s end-of-year roundup of health and science news in 2011. (Note: I haven’t looked at the actual study referred to, nor at any other analyses of it, so this is quoted verbatim from The Week without additional interpretation from me.)
I just want to thank you again for presenting and attending and making last night happen. It was a lovely evening and everybody seemed to have a good time. I received very good comments and I even had requests from potential presenters ror the next Kucha Pecha.
I know someone emailed me about that a few months ago & I'm so sorry I never got a chance to get back to you. This has just been a crazy few months & my priorities drop out of whack sometimes. But, now, if you are interested in writing a guest post for me...please get in touch ASAP!!
Peter and his father Tomas, both woodcutters, are newly-arrived outsiders in the village of Chust. Tomas is drunken, secretive, violent--and Peter doesn't understand many of the things his father does, including why he has dug a channel so that their hut is surrounded by running water. Chust is a closed, suspicious village--and it is riddled with the undead, who rise from their graves and infect the whole community. This is certainly a Gothic horror story--but it is much more than that. Marcus delineates his characters with care and skill--and the sub-plot (equal in importance) which runs alongside the thrilling main story of the rise of the Shadow Queen is that of a father-and-son relationship full of terrible loss and also of a kind of sorrowful, elegaic redemption. It's one of those stories where you long for it to come all right in the end, even though you know it can't. I stayed up all of one night reading--and no doubt I shall stay up on another when I read the sequel, The Kiss of Death. Highly recommended for weaning teens off saccharine vampires, and for all who like good writing and a damn fine story.
I’ve seen these graphs going around social media and have brushed them off as being non-consequential. Often commentators of the graphs are quick to say things like, “It’s all Obama’s fault!” or “Yeah, you’re right: it was Bush’s fault!” and so the blame game continues. I feel it is a bit childish and doesn’t really address the fundamental issues on hand.
This one in my opinion probably sits in the middle of three different types. These are the people who are wearing the wrong type of armour (for example spell power on a huntar…sorry hunter), or are using the wrong abilities at the wrong time (not so much an issue nowadays). You can always tell these sort as when you offer them advice you get no answer, BUT generally when you tell them to stop needing on items that they don’t actually need they will stop.
Trust me, I have a plan for next year...look out Target and Walgreens !!!!!!
to disappear down an empty street. We crashed at home.
Why art thou cast down, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted in me? hope thou in God: for I shall yet praise him for the help of his countenance. Psalm 42:5 (KJV)
Image 1 was taken on shutter priority, in order to see if it could handle the terrible weather, however it made the whole picture too dark, so I switched over the manual.
I mean some of us trust our husbands with our life and heart, why not the one who created us to begin with. You trust the bankers at your local bank. Some of you probably don’t check your accounts because you trust the banks so much. We can be so backwards. We can have all the common sense in the world and book sense and still not get it… Amazing! Will you start putting Him first by seeking His will for your life? His purpose for when and why He created you?
scooter is back and more needed than ever, at the fabulous new red rattler theatre in marrickville. we’ll be playing on saturday the 16th of may with katalea sweet and pow pow shazaam’s jazz trio. should be rad! stay tuned for a poster!
Crossing over, the landscape changed drastically. The relatively flat land gave way to sharp peaks. Growing taller and more threatening as the two men navigated the terrain. They traveled as far in as they dared, before it would become too difficult to turn the buggy around. Each man disembarked and turned on their personal lamps on their shoulders.
The best part of the forest is that it doesn't have to be an actual forest. It is often, but this is any setting where there is an air of mystery - something strange - and that teaches the hero something while in there.
(1 Timothy 5:16-18 (NIV))
Budget release on which the tracks butt up against one another to make room for "Over One Hour Of Music".
In all his years the farmer has never seen a 'brave' fox who was not both suspicious and scared of humans (let's face it, nothing else preys on them) and we cannot help speculating that this might be a 'pet' fox which has been released. We do sometimes get urban foxes which have been dumped in the countryside. My only hope is that he/she learns quickly that humans are not to be trusted and that fox hunts are best experienced from well down in one's earth - also of course that my hens are safe from a hungry fox!
Hing - 2 pinches
And so begins another exciting chapter in Katie's life. She is thrilled with this, not only because she'll get to meet and perform with the amazing characters she watched and looked up to as a child, but because she'll be a part of something that will offer hope and inspiration and guidance to young children traveling the same journey she traveled at their age. Healing herself by helping others heal - there are just no words to express how huge that is for her.
The faith it takes to give someone a second chance, to believe in someone’s dreams, to walk with someone through a struggle, is directly tied to your faith in God.
#3 Eat Fats
I am not convinced Austin & MacAuley are offering anything more (at best) than the better author solutions services, and that is giving the benefit of the doubt to an ‘independent trade publisher’ willing to ask perspective authors to ‘contribute’ a four-figure amount to the publication of their book. Austin & MacAuley are attempting to operate Partnership Publishing like Pen Press (PPS 233.13), Epic Press (EPS 186.09), Derwent Press (DWP 194.02), Book Guild Publishing (BGP 218.05) and Matador (MAT 256.20). As publishing develops new models to move forward, this model of publishing is coming more to the forefront, and I actually believe UK publishers are ahead of their US cousins on this. But when Partnership Publishing is on the table as an option, the author must at least know from the outset that this is potentially one of the models on offer to them and more importantly that it will come at a cost. It must never be introduced to the author/publisher partnership after submission. When a publisher does this, and suggests a financial contribution is required, it renders the idea of a partnership between author and publisher as the poor cousin of publishing, rather than a reasonable and viable alternative for a book.
Why is so hard not to get caught up in comparing myself to others? Wanting these other scrapbookers, most of whom I do not know, to come and be impressed with my pages?
I am praying that it would not happen to me. And now I am still hoping that the Filipino nation had not heard such arrogant line. In silence, I have entertained another hope – that Sonny Trillanes hadn’t become (elected) as senator of this country. (My apologies to the your Senator and his family.)
The armored dude grabs his bow and shoots at Larryl. It’s a hit. After this, he disappears through the door into the interior of the warehouse again.
16. Collect information about topics that interest you and save them. Fill one box for one topic. Fill another box for another topic.
Riding wings of wind, it was everywhere
Along the way Hermel’s mind was on the fate of his sister, Iliza. On the one hand he felt compelled to hurry back to the village, but he also knew that there was no real need to rush. While it was possible that she might be molested, Hermel thought it was not likely. What the bandits wanted was the ‘spring seed’ from the Commons Barn probably with the intent to sell it to a wealthier village. If the bandits defiled the women then their fathers would not accept them back into the family, and so as bargaining chips they’d be rendered useless. Life in rural Hobbington was harsh, and this was one of the realities. Defiled daughters could not be married, and would prove a deadly liability. Therefore, he expected that the bandit chief would keep discipline among his rogues. It would be unnatural and hasty, in fact, if he rushed back too quickly, for in his time, unlike ours today, no one expected anything to happen immediately. Things moved according, not to the minute, or the day, or the week, but most generally by season... slowly.
Although I do enjoy having sex for hours on end, sometimes once I’ve cum I do just wanna pass out. It’s like when you have a really big meal and then you go into a food-induced coma and have an amazing sleep. I just wanna have a sex coma. I’ve exerted a lot of energy and am feeling satisfied after a good orgasm or two. It’s now time to sleep. And sometimes a guy is trying to prove how awesome he is by going all night. When I really just wanna go to sleep because I have to get up early tomorrow. I’ve already cum twice. I get it, you’re manly and great in bed. I don’t care anymore.. Just fucking cum on my ass and get it done with. And no, I don’t wanna cuddle. Going to roll over now and enjoy my sex-coma.
And then...I came across this and went all thoughtful again, the tune reminding me of decades gone when the song meant something else, entirely.
Scannable Resume
We usually do everything in one pan but this time he did the potatoes and I did the onions at the same time. Later I commented how much more relaxed it seemed to be to make the tortilla together, but then I realized that after cooking the onions, I whisked the eggs and then left the kitchen where he and my daughter finished dinner. So I think maybe it was relaxing because he did most of the work!
The police hunt for suspects but Nadia’s secret could wreck the lives of many, all who have motive to kill her.
So, being that I'm moving and all, I should probably be packing all my decor stuff up rather than putting it out, but I can't help it. Summer decorating is so fun and it just seems wrong to go the whole season with no sign of it in my house.
8 weeks until I leave….
Bill: Dad was a self-taught musician. No academic training. He had to pick up everything either by ear or reading a system of musical notation that I created for him to be able to learn new songs or arrangements. I would write out the letters of the alphabet in place of the corresponding musical notes. Aside from the harp, he could play piano, clarinet, and chromatic harmonica, learned by the hunt and peck, search and destroy methods he used for his constant, creative discoveries.
Traditional Fantasy and High Fantasy blur together. If you want to write about a fantasy world peopled with complex and socially diverse characters, and with stable “laws” of magic, you are squarely on the science fiction side of High Fantasy. If your worlds are quirky, unpredictable, and operate not according to laws but according to the logic of dreams, then you’re writing in traditional fantasy mode.
I wasn't planning on posting anything until Monday, but then I realized I might not make it to Monday alive
And, as the president of a multi-ethnic state, Zuma ought to firmly
For wool coats, I mist vinegar and water mixed with cedar and pine essential oils and brush them out with boar hair bristles about once a month. Before I pack them away for the summer, I make sure to let them air out completely (preferably outdoors when it's warm but under the shade), brush them clean then store them in a vacuum bag with cedar chips. I have never dry cleaned anything in my life and I don't intend to.
The tribe was happy to dance for us and invite us in to see their world. We also delivered some needed medical supplies.
This is what happens to me a lot. Apparently, lots of people have "liked" my page because they like the name "The Bitchy Stitcher" so I guess they feel like it's something they can identify with. And then I share some photos that a reader sent me of knitted boxer shorts with some very clever appendage-pouches built in and I get someone saying, "I'm no prude, but no more pictures please." Or a reference to something that was on the blog gets commented on and somebody pipes up, "This blog sounds great! Can someone give me the link?" And I'm not a naturally kind and diplomatic person, so I have to dunk my head in a bucket of cold water, take a couple shots of whiskey, and count to 100 very slowly before I can answer without being rude.
No matter what we say, and no matter what we write in opposition to the ongoing, ever increasing pressure to conform to what a politically correct "public health" juggernaut defines as “normal” and “healthy” behavior, the PC plague infected Anti-smoker faction of all that government sponsored “help” continues to routinely claim it’s “the addiction talking”.
JB: I’m not too sure about this question, to be honest. It was Captin Franko’s script idea that really got me thinking about a darker Doctor, and I think James managed to tap into this and see where he was coming from. James’ portrayal is going to be more serious in some aspects but he will still have a light hearted side when it comes to his companions. I say this, but I’m pretty much in the dark about what James specifically wants to do with the character! I’m just waiting to hear what he makes of the lines on the page; I’m as excited to hear him as you!
Want to get to know better Ashley? Make sure to follow her, I promise you will be happy you did!
Sex-O-Rama Vol.2 was my very first post at Funky Frolic and now I have finally got around to putting up Volume 1. As far as I know this is not a collection of original soundtrack recordings but cover versions all produced by the same musicians. However this fact shouldn't diminish the joy of listening to these deep bass and wah wah infused delights. It certainly makes for ideal background music if you are planning an evening of passion with your significant other.
Smarmy teens that know more than the parents? Check! But Dad engages richly with his teen daughter who really does love her Dad. Cussing teens (and kids)? Check! But I’m afraid that’s the reality in many, many families today.
The way these things work today, is just stupid.
Ever cheaper processors, networks and sensor technology have created billions of constant data gatherers worldwide. Further, the flow of data from (and to and between) said data gatherer is not generally impeded by gatekeepers – unlike the relatively restrained government and corporate sectors.
"And it’s certainly not going to take the responsibility off of us as parents to make sure that we’re making the right choices for our families," Mrs. Obama said about the iconic limitations. "That's still on us."
So stay tuned for regular posts beginning late next week from Montreal—and also watch for updates on the CCA's website (I'll have specific info on exactly where my posts for the CCA will appear soon). And, of course, huge thanks to the CCA for making this summer possible!
There was plenty of Twitter action going on, from the frightened to the frivolous and one of many tweets that caught my eye bemoaned the fact that anyone in expensive trainers, brand name clothing and being organised using smartphones, could ever claim to be in poverty. No argument here. Everyone that was looting in Manchester, Brum, Wolves, West Brom and Bristol had absolutely nothing to do with Mark Duggan (http://inspectorgadget.wordpress.com/2011/08/04/man-dead-and-police-officer-hurt-in-tottenham-shooting/), they were out because they thought they could get away with it and it's been on the way for years.
Well, I’m quite sure Joelyn McCallum served Alpena well. I had the chance to speak to her briefly the other night about her position as Alpena County Treasurer and the passion for her position was unmistakably apparent. She’s clearly surrounded herself with people that obviously care and support her. There’s an old mantra along the lines of “you are who you surround yourself by”.
The girl is my mother, the dapper man is her father (who died long before I came along). The photo was taken in the 1920s in Bridlington by, I think, a beach photographer. They’re on holiday. She’s as happy as can be; he, though he’s keeping it under his hat, is no less proud.
The Massachusetts law was principled. The government sanctions were crafted to give the appearance of being principled.
And here we are again, at the crossroads, sitting with our backs to each other. It is a big fight and hence the famous silent treatment. The only connect whatsoever is, kiddo jumping after piggy backing me into his warm embrace. An obligatory smile to the little one and he is sent back to me. All of this because, it is the IPL time. And the big fight is between biwi and TV. What is it with Men and Cricket? Or should I say, what is it with Indian Men and Cricket?
That I may see the portal of Saint Peter,
We would like to thank everyone who has helped us start up the brewery this year – all of our family, friends, the supporters we have met during our travels around Louisiana, the retailers, bar and restaurant owners who continue to believe in us, folks at all of the distributors, the three people who read my blogs, and everyone who has stopped by the brewery to say hello. We appreciate all of the help more than we could ever express. And for those lucky enough to try one of the few cases of our most outlandish beer yet (a test batch of a very high alcohol Christmas seasonal ale, squeezed out of a single oak barrel and spiked with a very secret, and in many States, illegal ingredient), don’t worry, it will be available next year in larger quantities.
Did we all have a wonderful weekend?
Puree the beans, mayo, mustard, and turmeric in a food processor (or with an immersion blender) until smooth. Stir in the shallot and black salt to taste. Pour into a piping or sandwich bag and refrigerate for at least 40 minutes.
Beloved, let us love one another,
Rating (0)
it was a night to remember our story. how the Lord is using it and how it continues to change our family forever. in that there was pain and brokenness as it took me back to august 2010. but from that place it took my heart to a place of joy and immense thankfulness. thank for rallying alongside us and the american cancer society and fighting for a cure.
Unfortunately this is a project, that despite it's low cost to initiate as hovercraft don't need a proper landing area, will never happened because of the small minded people who work for Edinburgh Council. That's it for this entry but I've got so much more I could say about the disjointed thinking that goes on with regards to Edinburgh's transportation network.
It's also another of my husband's earlier pieces that I dug out and framed - easy pickins as the 5x7 standard size is a quick one to do up. You may be noticing a trend in black frames - I am, too. I hope I don't find it necessary to scale that back, and I hope I still love how it looks years from now because we have a LOT of black frames in our house. Eh, black is always in style.
The place: New York City. The date: 1982. The situation: There's a killer on the loose. Well, actually, there a thousands of killers on the loose in New York City; that's what made the city so great. No, this particular killer is unique in that they prefer to butcher their victims in a manner that makes sadism seem quaint. The first person to get their Fulci-approved eye area close-up is a cranky shopkeeper who finds a human hand while walking his dog underneath the Brooklyn Bridge. The close-up occurs while his dog is in the process of returning what he thinks will be a stick. Getting in real tight on the upper part of the man's weather-beaten face, Fulci's camera captures every detail of his shocked expression as he realizes that ain't no stick.
making space for the best part (coming up in a minute). I want to point out that after I made the holes,
Tunku Aziz and the DAP leadership clashed in opinions over the April 3.0 rally with former branding it as an encouragement of Malaysians to “break the law” and the latter throwing its full support behind the gathering.
When the car is rolling, the upper chamber on one side and the lower chamber on the other side create high pressure. As these chambers are now connected to the lower pressure chambers on their opposite side, the fluid displaced with little resistance. This presents no increase in the cars roll stiffness.
Whisk the eggs and sugar together until well combined. Then add in the mashed bananas and mix well again. Fold in the dry ingredients carefully, and then pour in the melted butter and fold again. Pour into the prepared loaf tin. Bake for 35 - 45 minutes until cooked through.
Inter-Disciplinary.Net,
You were bound
new album, "The Song Of Solomon" is inspired by the famously
Rayloth bowed. “As you wish, Master Satele. I will send a report when I have something to send.”
stirring until cheese melts. Serve with fritters as
Course Description:
Barack Obama: Use Former War Budget to Boost US Economy
Okay, okay, I'm severely biased. Can you blame me??
What’s in it:
I was stuck, stuck, stuck over what to put in the living room above my club chair.
Thanks for your continued thoughts and prayers.
Ironically, the singer most responsible for setting off the changes that brought an end to the big band era became Ellington’s salvation. He signed to Frank Sinatra‘s new Reprise label. Musicians who had previously worked with Ellington returned to the Orchestra as members: Lawrence Brown in 1960 and Cootie Williams in 1962.
Also, I worried about her noise when I didn't hear a single peep from any other kid in there (besides the angels up front). Do Catholics know a secret for keeping their kids quiet that Mormons don't?
Check out the Tupperware Opportunity tab at the top of the page. There are so many ways to sell Tupperware! On-line at your own website, fundraising, traditional parties...and it really is so much fun!
and it will slip past
Thank you God for never giving up on me – may I continue to look to You and the blessings you have for me.
Some people are more prone to worry excessively and not take time for self-care, which is vital as a means to decompress from the conflict. This can result in excessive worry and concern about the next time the conflict mayarise. A person’s conflict resolution style may determine how they handle the conflict at work, thus impacting the degree to which this affects them psychologically or mentally. For example, some people experience sleep difficulties, change in eating habits, avoidance behaviors, limited self-care (working out, time with family and friends, positive interaction with others, doing things that bring them joy), or absenteeism from work. Some may even choose to self-medicate due to a high conflict environment. People use different strategies to manage conflict. Some internalize the conflict (have headaches, stomachaches, body aches and pains) or externalize (become angry pr agitated, have outbursts, or self-medicate). Obtaining the necessary skills and tools to manage the conflict more effectively becomes paramount in order to minimize the negative psychological and mental effects.
Beautifully colored with Promarkers, Diane added to her image by using some buttons for the centers of the flowers. Not only are they a cute embellishment, they give some texture to her card, too.
We took you to the doctor last week and you weighed 16lbs. 9oz. That's about a pound more than last month. You love to eat! You're still getting 100% breastmilk, but now you're also eating sweet potatoes, carrots, winter squash, green peas and brown rice. We've tried bananas and even blueberries, but unfortunately fruit just doesn't agree with you right now. We'll try it again as you get a little older.
Results Show:
-fell in love
There are 16 slide strips, and though they are numbered the fact that so many of them are just illustrations of ships shooting at other ships with “Pu! Pu!” type sound effects written on them makes recreating the plot of the film with these a task only suited to a hard core Star Wars fan, not a toddler.
Never forget to get lending products only when necessary. Be cautious in borrowing much larger volumes because you may possibly not be able to shell out the dough in time. You ought to be individually distinct in finding out which expenditures are important and people who can hold off until the next pay day.
But it was in the third Bond film, Goldfinger, that Q would become iconic. That's when he unveils his tricked-out Austin Martin DB-V, with machine guns in the headlights, spinning license plates, homing device trackers, and the ejector seat. It's too bad that the car doesn't end up amounting to much...but Q's attitude toward James Bond becomes clear when Bond says "You're joking!" in reference to the ejector seat, and Q replies, "I never joke about my work, 007."
1. To make the yogurt sauce by combine all the ingredients in a bowl and mixing well with a whisk. Set in fridge to chill.
Jays now sitting at 14-11 which is not quite as good as i had hoped but things are on the rise. Now if we can just get Bautista hitting again…
Don’t ever allow me to become numb to your conviction Lord. Keep me on the narrow path. Keep my vision on you Lord. Forgive me of my sins, cleanse me of my faults. I am sorry Lord. I love you
Once we became settled in comfortably, we realized that we missed having an exchange student around, so we signed up for our third hosting experience. The month of August brought us Liu Shuer, commonly referred to as "Effy", all the way from DongGuan China. She will be spending the entire school year with us. She is only 16 and a bit younger than our previous girls, but she is definitely "sugar and spice and everything nice". Effy has a lively and vivacious personality, yet she fits in so well with our low-key existence. She is an amazing big sister to Chloe and Pearl and she is willing to answer the same questions over and over, since that is what 6 and 7 year olds do. At least the girls can now count to 10 in Chinese.
The "Milk" cut from Create a Critter - cut four times (twice from transparency, twice from brown cardstock)
At once, I identified with this plangent tale of brother and sister who long to belong and, like all of us at one time or another in our lives, feel lost, feel like outsiders. In a way, they stand for all the refugees, all the homeless, all the people in camps, all the dispossessed, who walk across our Middle Earth.
And to Sweetpea- I am Your Aunt Boo!
I’m back to my idea of the grey walls, but there are so many beautiful tones to pick from!:
Mr Rogers told BusinessDay he “vigorously denied the allegations” and would “strongly defend the case”.
More people should come see us, we're pretty great at this whole tour guide thing!
My entry was accepted in April to compete in the 34th Uniformed Services Showjumping International Competition in London. This show is a military only showjumping show that is open to military members world wide. It is hosted by the Honourable Artillery Company. The classes go up to 3'3". You can bring your own horse, but obviously that won't be the case for me. I'd LOVE to take Klein mare but 1) the AF won't pay for that and 2) we'd be there less than a week so it wouldn't be worth a trip for her. So, I have a King's Troop royal horse reserved from the Light Cavalry for me to compete on.
“It was a tremendous learning experience and a great way to meet new people,” said Frankson. “Peter, Laura and Marshall are great people and so are the crew we dealt with during the prep and the taping. I’m glad others who watched it enjoyed it too. It was a blast!”
There was something so magical about sitting on the deck in the rocking chairs before the town below came alive, sipping coffee in the cool morning air. It was equally magical in the evenings as the sounds of Eureka's nightlife echoed up soothing my soul. In my humble opinion The Peabody House has the BEST location in town.
The gardens at Villa Cimbrone are steeped in history and famous artists, writers and actors have escaped to its peace and tranquility over the years. A few visitors who have stayed are D H Lawrence, Greta Garbo, E M Forster, Piaget, Winston Churchill, to name but a few.
If only my two were better at clean-up...
3. Attempt to and/or actually grope your nurse: Then blame her negative reaction toward your loving caress on the fact that you're missing a limb. Clearly she would LOVE being groped by OTHER patients
Bob is visiting friends and family in the London area and will join us in Stevenage.
Mile 13 - 10:08
So following from that, I made outrageous plans, had to reassess about what was actually possible, cut a billion people off the invitation list and then it turned into a small afternoon tea on a terribly wet Sydney afternoon!
other four people. What that means is that on Monday night, each of us
It is a large dog, and a small house, so you do the math for how much oxygen is left. No? You won't? Well, I'll tell you; not fucking much, that's how much. She has worms, which is bad enough in itself, but I can't afford to do anything about it, so we're all suffering. She lets out a big sigh, and then she groans, and then the stench hits you, and then you groan.
I hope this information helps you and those important to you. If you have additional tips others can use, please share your ideas. Definitely take the time to watch those shows on Facebook and Google on CNBC. Open your eyes and be well informed.
Isn't this image by Saturated Canary gorgeous!! Although I still think that she will get cold tootsies, personally I love my fluffy lounge socks they are fabulous and fluffy, and much better than slippers as I have a few pairs so can wash them each time so they don't get yucky!!
Cool on wire rack.
When I Lay My Burden Down--Same.
For years i thought I had lost all my inspiration. I felt i wasn’t as creative as usual. I didn’t do as much art or writing as i did when I was younger. I didn’t play as much music. In suppressing things from my past I suppressed so much of myself. It wasn’t that my inspiration was gone it had been pushed down. Once I stopped running from my pain inspiration came back to me. I wasn’t suppressing things and was able to use my inspiration to help me.
I'm temporarily packing up the majority of my closet for the month of May. Why, you ask? Because I can.
I have opted for reasons of time and resource consumption to return to my practice of periodic self-intervention with a pair of clippers. The experiment was interesting and resulted in a practical appreciation for the potential value (never tested) of mustache wax for keeping one's mustache out of one's food and mouth... The use of baking soda solution and apple cider vinegar for hair care worked very well, but with my natural oil levels and the daily run-commute the treatments needed to become more frequent as the mass of hair continued to increase. The experiment did not culminate in the 'growth plateau' that I had aspired to when I began the experiment, but I feel like I have a pretty good idea of what I would like if I were genetically me, but born tens of thousands of years ago before we made a cultural habit of interventionist hair styling. From earlier periods in my life, the late undergraduate epoch to be precise, I can share that the head-hair plateau happens at about shoulder length... the beard remains a mystery... would it have grown to the nipples or the belly button or beyond.... we may never know, and I suspect we will never find out.
Reid has since left the suit, along with several other original plaintiffs. But through her role in the Colombia scandal, she may be changing Secret Service culture from the inside. According to the Washington Post, she was the one who rounded up the 11 implicated agents and sent them home, as well as notifying higher-ups of their alleged misconduct. Such decisive action is apparently typical of her approach. A former colleague told the Post, “If every boss was Paula Reid, the Secret Service would never have a problem. It would be a lot more boring, but never a problem.” And another agent said her reaction to the agents’ behavior was no surprise: “You did it in her house, so you better know she’s going to come down hard.”
I see the face of a friend who is in the intensive care unit in a hospital in Chapel Hill, fighting for her life. Pray. I think of my three closest friends, and the battles they are going through right this very minute, real issues with potentially lasting implications, and I ask God’s guidance for each of them by name. Several long-distance friends from high-school, brought back into my life via the miracle of Facebook, who stand in the need of prayer two-thousand miles away…..please, Lord, hear their cries.
Preheat oven to 350°F. Line 2 cookie sheets with parchment paper or silicon liners. Drop the dough in heaping tablespoons about 2 inches apart. Bake for 8-10 minutes, or until the tops are cracked and the edge resists collapsing when pushed lightly with your finger but the center is still softish. Let the cookies cool for a couple of minutes before transferring to metal racks.
at least the road
Joe had to work (and didn’t feel well anyway), so it was just Anna and me last night. We went to a really nice neighborhood and hit up about 20 houses or so. Anna had such a blast! She kept saying, “Mommy, we go to more doors now?” She definitely had the “Trick or Treat” saying down, but I had to prompt her to say it each and every time. She waxed shy every time we’d approach new people. I think she loved being outside so late at night and actually getting candy from people. I think she thinks this is normal – you knock on someone’s door and get candy. Let’s hope she doesn’t try to do this throughout the year.
Why did they wait five years to settle up the estate?
George Cortina
It helps when you have a good week and a few laughs along the way. I used to pack all kinds into the weeks away, a bit of a wind up merchant but had a serious side when it came to ensuring everyone was where they should be at any given time.
* 2 packages of cream cheese, softened (I used the No Name brand)
#041 Mo Vaughn (Mets)
Time to dust off the old CV, update my LinkedIn profile, and do a whole number of other things I haven’t really had to do in a while. Hell, I might even revive my personal website again. I’ve always had leave to go and do the odd piece of freelance here and there, provided I prioritised Strategy Informer work first, but to be honest I rarely had the time as I was very much focused on those guys. Now let’s see what I can do… should probably brush up on some of the multi-media skills I picked up at uni, like audio & video editing, podcasting… my rudimentary HTML… even my InDesign skills, which I rather liked doing.
I trained Reggie with small food treats. Nothing opens his ears like little pieces of hot dog. Feeding schedule: twice a day, once about seven in the morning, and again at six in the evening. Regular store-bought stuff; the shelter has the brand
The Allgau country lanes wind between forest and hills, affording a great chance to assess the handling of this tall machine. True to its Norton frame heritage, the Mammut tracked straight and true and secure on all corners, with no drama or fuss. The high center of gravity and weight disappeared once in motion, and it felt completely secure and familiar banking around corners. Changing direction on short 'S' bends was easy and required no effort, the Mammut proving silky smooth when transitioning from left to right. The wheelbase is short for such a large machine (giving rise to a cobby appearance with the large tanks and double-headlamp variants), and above 80mph, a slight weave set in; nothing dramatic, just noticeable, and it didn't get worse, nor disappear in a straight line. When banked over at the slightest angle, any such uncertainty disappeared. My Velocette Thruxton has the same quirk at over 100mph, yet is completely sure-footed, so the weave didn't bother me, but it is noticeable if subtle.
The comments below have been moderated in advance.
Junior
INTERIOR: REBEL GROWLER -- MAIN HALLWAY.
Cheery Lynn Designs Dies - Fanciful Flourish B117
I had no good answer to this question, but felt I ought to offer some hope.
According to all reports, the meeting between the General and the President lasted about twenty minutes.
On the shallow side I'm obviously carrying the weight of two pregnancies in quick succession and the changed body shape as a result. There are angry little lines where there never were before. I suddenly have chunky arms, a mean little caesar scar and so on. I'm working on improving what I can though - I meet with my personal torturer, er, I mean trainer thrice a week and hopefully that which can be improved will be. The scars and marks I mind less so. They are reminders. Badges of grief and badges of honour. Being able to carry a child must certainly be one of our greatest gifts and privileges and these marks are reminders of that - I'm grateful for them. Ha! Just reread that last sentence. Dam I'm cheesy. But it is true!
Guy Maddin is a Director (with a capital ‘D’). It’s not that he’s pretentious. It’s not that his films are almost impenetrable on a level of perplexing lunacy that’s positively Lynch-ian . It’s not that he’s a bad person. It’s that he is fucking crazy. When you watch other films by ‘Directors’ (looking at you, Von Trier) you sit back and just accept that these guys know what they’re doing and that they’re smarter than you and that there is no way you will get it so shut up and watch, you uneducated, whorish heathen. But that isn’t true with Mr. Maddin. His films are so blissfully bat-shit that one cannot help but fall into the oceanic quagmire of his rattled psyche. You hit the waters with a crash, your every inch soaking in nonsensical purity, before being knocked about by wave upon wave of sexually-confusing-melodramatic-nightmare/dream-worthy imagery. This isn’t Maddin masturbating into your eye (like some people I know…Von Trier.) , this is a man inviting you inside his head for an hour and twenty minutes.
out from my thoughts,
Last month, University of California-Los Angeles hosted the first-ever National Student Conference on Integrative Medicine, an event created by students looking to build upon the traditional medical school curriculum by exploring topics from what they dubbed an “integrative perspective.” It drew more than 100 attendees, including some who don’t have access to training in integrative medicine at their home institutions.
It arrives hot on the heels of the magnificent Sherlock, Steven Moffat and Mark Gatiss’ inspired update-cum-re-imagening-cum-hommage to the great characters and stories created by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle. After 100 years of pastiches and adaptations, this seems like a good opportunity to reflect again on the depictions of the friendship between the great consulting detective and his great friend – what is the bond that ties them together?
first to know...
The motion is well written and apparently, Jackson files better motions than the “real” attorney. It looked legitimate and it was accepted as truth. The question now remains, did Casey Anthony have anything to do with this motion?
There is a bastardize in Bob-omb Battlefield that allows you to go up the abundance quickly. Actuate by branch up the abundance until you arise to the aboriginal angle in the abundance that metal assurance arise out of. Go into the indentation, and angle there. The bold will bastardize you to accession angle college up in the mountain.
"Theres another bloke called Steve Jones who is going to be on X Factor"
My body is still foreign to me. It still doesn’t feel right. But I’m trying to bring my awareness to my breathing & start there. Trying to bring my anatomy knowledge to good use & start to appreciate the complexities of this body that is still such an alien thing.
Juan D'Arienzo – Mucho MuchoThe above link gives you a high quality stream. There's a version on YouTube with some meaningless graphics, and you can get it on iTunes. It doesn't sound great on my computer speakers - if you have quality earphones you'll probably want to use them to hear the bass. I can't hear it at all if I don't plug mine in, and it's very important.
After the second episode was over, Peter leaned over and gave me a soft kiss. We got into making out and he stopped for a second to just look at me.
Genre: Action/Comedy
Beer Advocate usually attracts a higher caliber of reviewers compared to RateBeer, but the bunch weighing in on Bell's Winter White ale is giving me second thoughts. Why don't people consider the style before hacking away at a review. Or maybe read the brewer's notes?
11. Stephanie - 1958
Share 3 "I'm ____ because" statements of yours in the comments!!
So obviously it makes sense Najib and Rosmah would want their lawyer to represent them – someone entrusted to answer all the relevant questions on their behalf and also to make the necessary denials. Since this involves a head of government, Najib’s grilling will be done in a closed courtroom and of course, nothing will be made public. An experienced legal beagle like Shafee would set this as a first condition before agreeing to take part.
Week 16 vs. San Francisco: Like the Arizona game, this could also have playoff implications written all over it whether for a division crown or wild card spot.
and here is what I did with those colors featuring
Essentially papal calendars were never going to celebrate alongside the Jews: Easter had to be after spring equinox, but separate from Passover. Easter for the Picts was obviously a festival which was going to catch on, accustomed as they were to sacred seasonal celebrations. A wave of new religion spread like wildfire through a nation only recently converted in pockets by wandering monks.
**My post will also share some thoughts, the hymn, and scripture or scriptures that I chose (usually from the NIV), and a picture of my page.
He was handcuffed and taken to the police station where he was charged with assault, crimen injuria, and refusing to comply with an order from a traffic "officer".
Above you can see the process. The ingredients are measured into a saucepan containing one litre/quart of water. Add one cup of soap flakes, half a cup of borax and half a cup of washing soda. Turn on the heat and stir. Bring the mix to the boil, stirring as it heats, and by the time the mixture is boiling, ALL the ingredients should be dissolved.
Here comes another of them scientists
I have been thinking and debating on the epitaph for this "grave of all graves". My name will appear on the marker (that goes without saying) but the epitaph. I'm considering: Here the Asshole lies... face down so you can KISS MY ASS.
Although the series (both books and films) is now complete and everyone in the fandom is feeling the loss to some extent, the US is fairly well-served for Potter-related entertainment from the theme park in Florida (and soon to be in Los Angeles) as well as conferences taking place all over
Butterfly: We make the chrysalis that holds us in and protects us. Then what seems like death is the process that allows us to grow our wings and develop our body preparing for our new journey. All of life is like this.
Here is the original 1939 inspiration:
How to join us? Follow these easy steps and you are done!
One of the friends who has brought Buddhism into my family is Sharron Mendel Swain, who was raised by one Jewish and one Christian parent, found a spiritual home in Buddhism in her 20s, and now runs a UU religious education program. Her Buddhist practice is based on the teachings of peace activist and Vietnamese Buddhist monk Thich Nhat Hanh, who was nominated for the Nobel Peace Prize by Martin Luther King Jr., and created the Plum Village community in France. Recently, I asked Sharron about the appeal of Buddhism for her, as an interfaith child.
I’m sorry for not explaining better the whole meaning of this, but, in opposition to the first episode the story is not as straightforward, having many dreams and creatures, and hidden meanings… There’s even books written about this, such as the very good Genesis and The Lamb Lies Down on Broadway by Kevin Holm-Udson, from which I took some of the info here posted.
Yes, I believe in a Creator, the living God of the Bible, one God in three persons, Father, Son, and Holy Spirit.
“There will be plenty of haggling over the details in the days ahead. But this debate boils down to a simple choice,” he said. “We can come together for the good of the country and reach a compromise; we can strengthen our economy and leave for our children a more secure future.
He continued freelancing in the recording and radio studios, most notably with the Dorsey Brothers and on Glenn Miller’s earliest recording date as a leader in 1935, playing on “Solo Hop”. At the same time, however, Berigan made the association that graduated him to fame in his own right: he joined Benny Goodman’s re-forming band. Legendary jazz talent scout and producer John Hammond, who also became Goodman’s brother-in-law in due course, later wrote that he helped persuade Gene Krupa to re-join Goodman, with whom he’d had an earlier falling-out, by mentioning that Berigan, whom Krupa admired, was already committed to the new ensemble. With Berigan and Krupa both on-board, the Goodman band made the legendary, often disheartening tour that ended with their unexpectedly headline-making stand at the Palomar Ballroom in Los Angeles, the stand often credited with the “formal” launch of the swing era. Berigan left Goodman to spend some time with Tommy Dorsey’s orchestra; his solo on the Dorsey hit “Marie” became considered one of his signature performances. Then, in 1937, Berigan assembled a band to record under his name, picking the then-little known Ira Gershwin/Vernon Duke composition, “I Can’t Get Started“. Berigan’s crisp trumpet work and passable vocal made the song the biggest hit of his career and his theme for the rest of his life. Berigan modeled his trumpet style in part on Louis Armstrong’s style, and often acknowledged Armstrong as his own idol. Armstrong, for his part, returned the compliment after Berigan’s death, saying the only thing wrong with Berigan was that he died too young.
Annie and Buster Fang have spent most of their adult lives trying to distance themselves from their famous artist parents. But when a bad economy and a few bad personal decisions converge, the two siblings have nowhere to turn but their family home. Reunited under one roof for the first time in more than a decade, Buster and Annie are forced to confront not only their creatively ambitious parents, but the chaos and confusion of their childhood. Written with wit and honesty, Kevin Wilson‘s The Family Fang (Ecco) is “a comedy, a tragedy, and a tour de force….The best single-word description would be genius” (Ann Patchett).
The first thing you are going to need to do is get onto the Virgin Media Super Hub settings. While in your Web browsers in the address bar write in the 192.168.0.1 this will bring up the Super Media Login screen. For the Username and Passwords they will be on the side of your Super Hub unless you have changed the Password yourself. After you have logged in the you are going to have you go onto Port Forwarding page.
me - *crickets*
Tell me about your experiences with breast cancer. Some of you are breast cancer survivors. I cannot tell you how happy I am that you are here to tell your story and live your life.
One Saturday morning, my 4-yr old son and I woke up before the girls did (aka my wife and two daughters). We quietly showered and dressed up…then sneaked out of the house. The boys were out on a secret mission…head to the local store for some bread, milk and eggs. The 30 minutes we spent together filled his tank to overflowing. By sunset, his mother and 20 year-old cousin had the escapade narrated to them over 7 times!
Both signs told people that the boy was blind. But the first sign simply said the boy was blind. The second sign reminded people how fortunate they were to have their sight.
I think my story says a few things:
to cover the cost of birth control, and Obama is up ten points with women from August - but they can't help themselves. One whiff of an uncontrolled pudenda and they start scrapping like housedogs who have been sprayed with pheromones, which makes for such classic TV moments as candidate Newt Gingrich, currently America's most famous serial
It is Memorial Day weekend and I do wish to honor all of the brave men and women who have fought and given their lives for their country. Thank you. My husband is enjoying the weekend marathon of old war movies on AMC.
CR: Difficult Susanna… always on stage, with everybody, always singing… and at the end of the opera you have sore feet! Joking aside, Susanna kicks her legs up along the whole opera. Then the universe becomes still… and she sings “Deh vieni non tardar”… The aria is charged with high sensuality, a unique example of musical mastery. It is a very beautiful role, but she is very transparent as a woman.
It was Monday afternoon before I got an appointment at my regular doctor's office. The rapid strep test came back negative, but I'll know tomorrow for sure. In the meantime, the good doctor concluded that I was "severely congested" and treated me for sinus and ear infections. Yay.
The best part of it all is that all internal traffic within your network is free. Hence you don’t have to pay anything for communication within the company and data traffic between company sites. Intranet within your office employees can be designed to compliment business obligations and this will benefit your company immensely. It will also increase the productivity of your employees and all resources you have invested in.
Blueberries: 3rd – SU concord crush, 2nd – SU island indigo, and 1st – SU baja breeze
One of the reasons I love the animated HOW THE GRINCH STOLE CHRISTMAS is that it combines the talents of three supremely gifted and legendary individuals: Theodor Geisel, Chuck Jones, and Boris Karloff. Even if it didn’t work, it’d be worth a watch just to see how the talents of these individuals blend together, but as I’m guessing you know – it does work.
But what it really got me thinking today when I read Sam's post.
Tipis have always been very popular in our household. Our next door neighbours have one in the field next to our house and Tom has spent many a happy hour in it with Betty and Dolly during the summer months.
We went out on Friday and that was pretty much a wrap on Saturday. I ended up staying out all night with Björn (2nd AC) and Spike (video) and good lord Vikings can drink. We had Indian food and beers then went bowling with beers and then went to see a metal show with beers. I won the bowling... match? What the hell do you call a round of bowling? It's not really a game is it? Whatever, I was victorious and I don't even bowl so maybe Crom is looking out for me this time.
This is something to make you go….hmm…where is my Bible?
I felt so bad for those keepers right then I would have bought each and every one of them a case of beer for their troubles.
If you have any questions, please contact Rita: email: rita@pacheco.ws
The Vulcan’s seat has slowly but surely developed an attitude problem that will almost certainly require surgery (either on the Vulcan, or on me, depending on how long I ignore it.) But it can’t be denied any longer: attitudanally-speaking, this ageing seat has become ‘aggressive.’
The first year we decided to go to Wales. None of us had ever been and, since we are all fans of the (original) TV show 'The Prisoner' we settled on Portmeirion. We booked a cottage in a neighbouring village and lunch on New Years day at the Portmeirion Hotel. The holiday itself was wonderful - walks on the beach, good food, stunning countryside and Portmeirion was amazing (even in the pissing rain!). The journey to get there however was...erm...eventful! I shall explain....
Sometimes, I design plan-o-grams and wall elevations:
Now the grandfather, Ed Doud (67) steps forward to tell his sob story and how he has to go back to Iraq (where he was born) to work because he has only $100. Mind you they had already abandoned a house in 2007, filed bankruptcy in March 08, have received a notice of foreclosure Feb 09 and the birther had been on disability and food stamps. In addition, and much more heinous, three of her six oldest children have neurological disabilities on the autism spectrum and have been getting federal assistance as well.
In honor of St. Patrick's Day, I thought I'd arrange the sweet peas in these canisters that used to sit on my grandmother's counter. I'm loving these green glass vessels for arranging flowers lately. They really intensify the color of the flower.
On another note, I'm on a radio show tomorrow night (all things being equal); The Dark, Camp and evil ATROCITY EXHIBITION, where I'll be poeticising and spinning tracks of wierdness. 1-3am fri morning (or thurs eve if you're anything like me) of RDU98.5.
Above is a cross stitch sampler that I finished up yesterday. It was designed by La-D-Da and called Tiny Sampler. It's so delicate and the GAST threads make it just feel loved.
First: If the company that the applicant is coming from is a “competitor company” of yours then the odds of getting a good reference are “slim to none”. I know it sounds strange at first thought….BUT….no company wants you to take their employee or even a former employee because then you may find out the company’s successes and dirty little secrets from the inside and out! SECRETS! And it is not uncommon for other employees and even their clients to then JUMP SHIP and follow this person. (This is very often done!) So it is safer to their bottom line and their reputation to not give a good reference even though it is illegal and unethical to do so! I personally have also seen applicants come up with excellent references and wind out to be an “OH NO”/nightmare employees! The people giving the reference to their competitor did well-they gave you one of their troublesome employees! And they just made you look bad for hiring their unwanted employee!
I have also planted five tuberoses (what was I thinking?) in a pot of their own; five gloriosa lilies (spread around the terrace, total crapshoot) and ten Abyssinian gladiolus (that's fine, they like it here, I know). I got rid of the pink hardy begonia. It was time. I hated it, lush as it was. It has left its offspring, however, and this evening I moved the ones I could find to the steps of the building. I won't mind them, there.
My best friend told me this story which he witnessed first hand. His friend in the university had dated a girl for almost two years and then one morning, the girl publicly dumped him. Reason? He lied about being a cultist. Apparently, the guy had told the girl that he was the leader of one of the daring campus cults and that had been the attraction…main attraction for the girl obviously. She was done with the guy and the relationship because her guy wasn’t the bad boy she had always fantasized about.
I’ve never really been able to accept the world as it is. Go to school, study hard, get a job, get a wife, die. I have been looking at the world through the eyes of the generations before me, blinkered, afraid, not daring the risk, and I’ve not fit in at all. You can say: “It’s just a phase.” You can say: “He’ll grow out of it.”
Just when you thought the BBC couldn't get any more embarrassingly politicised, it drops to previously unimaginable depths. On the BBC Radio 5 Victoria Derbyshire programme, a 78 year old man with mental health issues was allowed to humiliate his family by professing to be a woman trapped inside a man's body.
* Dance around your house
Finally she graduated high school; she went to college, so happy, so thrilled, at last she might find hot guys that one of them probably steals her heart and makes her forget about her cousin completely. Fortunately, that what happened, she was sitting with a group of friends, when a guy approached to them, and talked to them. He was tall, tanned, with rough features, and had very beautiful eyes. He was talking with them for long time, suddenly he noticed her and suddenly their eyes got connected for few seconds but to her it was a whole life time, she did not know how and why it happened but she fell in love with his eyes, they were sharp and pointed through her eyes and right to her heart; she felt that both of them were the only two people in the world, all that in few seconds. Finally a new “crush” appeared! She is really happy and she needed that; she wanted a new action in her life and she got what she wanted. She got a lovely reason to make her go to college every day dressed up and she is always in good mood. And every time they bump into each other he looks at her the same way he looked at her the first time: astonished; that she started to laugh at him whenevert he looks at her that way.
Hello! I am Heather, the artist and owner of Fresh Brewed Designs . I'm the wife of an amazing husband and mother of two sweet and talented kids. I home school my children. I LOVE coffee, creating and chatting with my friends. Fresh Brewed Designs is an online shop that I opened in November 2010. We sell a wide variety of rubber and digital stamps that grows daily. We have a digi release once (sometimes more) a month as well as our monthly rubber release and blog hops. At Fresh Brewed Designs we always have a fresh pot of creativity brewing. So stop by and join us for a cuppa whenever you want!﻿
"Republicans," says a New York Times report, "are standing by their campaign vows to slash spending for domestic programs immediately by at least one-fifth--$100 billion in a single year—-even as many mainstream economists say such deep cuts could further strain the economy and should await its full recovery...(T)hey will try to deny money to put Mr. Obama’s new health care law into effect, though they have not made clear what they would do to make up the cost savings that would be lost if they succeeded in repealing the law."
Whether it is a short story, a poem or an article, what makes a submission stand out for you?
I love shopping second hand, everything is a special treasure to me and I spent a fraction of what I could if I purchaed retail. I love the character of things that have been loved on through the years.
Ben and Sam share an apartment here in town. They come over for dinner pretty regularly, as you would expect two young, single guys to do. Sam's schedule at work even allows us to get together for a late lunch now and then. When they need something, they know we are just a phone call away. And this is one momma who enjoys answering the phone every time caller ID shows any one of her kids!
One Twin Cities company was featured each month. From that group of honorees, the Jefferson Awards Board chose one as the national winner. The 2010 National winner is the Shakopee Mdewakanton Sioux Community. They will be honored at the national awards ceremony in Washington D.C. this June.”
Then, to artificially ratchet up the drama even more, Sturgeon introduces this lame, “Enterprise ordered to Altair 6″ subplot. It’s silly and it’s not needed because Spock’s mate-or-die main plot is enough, but it’s like the producers decided, “We need to make Kirk look heroic” so they introduced this silly command from Starfleet that they have to report to Altair 6 just so Kirk can disobey orders to keep Spock from dying. (And then the episode robs him of the consequence of this at the end by having Vulcan heavyweight T’Pau call in a permission slip for him to have disobeyed a direct, super-important order.)
In the Marxist State.
Hi Readers! Today is officially “Take Our Sons & Daughters to Work Day.” And here is an official memo from one reader’s employer:
The abilities themselves are scarcely explained and I like it that way; this is so much cooler than just a boring ‘superhero origin’ movie because it doesn’t dwell on any of the usual crap that those do. It’s a smart, gritty movie that has some serious twists, turns and thrills that you won’t see coming. Unlike most ‘kid with superpower’ movies like Jumper and I Am Number 4, Chronicle is dark and feral all the way and doesn’t wimp out on the danger that would realistically be present. The focal character Andrew (can’t really call him a protagonist) doesn’t get the girl, not everyone makes it out OK and where a lot of films would go for a safer, more happy-go-lucky character arc…this movie just gets darker and darker. When you think it’s gotten to its lowest point, Chronicle surprises you and gets even darker where most movies would pull out and relieve the characters of their pain. I respect this movie for that.
"Ikaw naman! (Come on!) Diba we believe in the saying: There's always enough for everyone."
The obvious lesson here is that you should pursue downward mobility by moving every few years to poorer and poorer places in the world, right? As the aforementioned article also points out, moving does provide an opportunity to evaluate what’s worth piling in a moving van. Yet I’ve often talked about the importance of place and putting down roots. So, perhaps the solution is a discipline of seasonal cleaning. We already have this cultural concept of “spring cleaning“, but how many of us practice it? Choose a time of year to give your stuff a good cleaning and share with others out of your abundance.
It seems 2009 was a good year for you, winning awards and receiving positive reviews for both albums and shows. What about it do you think you will remember the most?
First, let me tell you a little bit about Dandelion!
I am a BIG FAN of zucchini! I like it any way it's prepared. I happened across a recipe for Zucchini & Red Onion Salad on-line and I'm making it tonight!
1. Preheat over to 425 degrees
- Edgar A. Guest
Having given fair warning, I know there are some out there who will still go "all in." If you are determined to make a rapid shift, let me share some ideas that will help give you an advantage and prevent failure. One of the main things you will need to do is pretty much eat through what you have in your pantry and refrigerator. Most folks don't keep a ton of food on hand, so this shouldn't take too long. The idea here is simple, if not obvious. Once you've eliminated the bad food from your surroundings, there's nothing left to lead you astray. I guess you could say I'm advising you to "eat yourself out of house and home!"
“I read your poem.” Silence – biting her bottom lip, trying to think of something more to say… time crept by, and each excessive tick of her mental clock brought more red into Beth’s face.
Confidence is a function of successful risk-taking. Take them back to times when they didn’t take the easy out.
Whether characters improve or go down-hill, the important thing is the flaws they overcome or develop along the way.
That won you without blows! Despising,
-After a massacre occurs, it's common practice to leave the site of the murders standing, but boarded up.
Be sure to stop by Kim's Blog NOW to see which designers have Teasers today! There's one more day of Teasers tomorrow, and then the Release is tomorrow night at 10 pm EDT! :)
“You keep saying, ‘the ladies.’ Do only women do this work?” I ask.
4. Benefits & Their Evil Twin, Taxes
Just checking my petticoat is in place. A girl always needs to check up on her undergarments.
These are things that have not yet been used and are, in fact, still in their original box while their fate is decided. Several of them turned out be very useful closer to the six month stage, so they are things you can delay purchasing until then.
6th Street Design School. I can’t believe I only recently found Kirsten. I can see why she has over 1000 faithful followers. Kirsten is an interior designer with a sense of style that I really admire and relate to. She also features cool etsy finds and rooms to inspire.
It’s right by this statue of Louis XIII, which was fun to see; I’ve been reading the D’Artagnan trilogy and he is the king in The Three Musketeers. The way he’s presented in the book is quite different from the statue….
Bringing their frozen swords, their salt-bleached eyes,
To round out our week, we found out yesterday that our desktop computer bit the dust. SO, now we get to shop for a new tower. Hubs really wants an iMac, but his farming stuff isn't Mac compatible, and there is nothing wrong with our monitor so we are just going to get a PC tower for now. We plan to go tomorrow and look at Best Buy and just have kind of a family day together, so I am actually looking forward to that.
See the gorgeous tag, below? My sweet bloggy friend Myric, over at Petites Passions, created it, and sent it to me! I just love it, and also love how she mixed sand with glitter (be still my heart!) for the border! The girl is a creative genius! Thank you again, Myric!
* A credit rating downgrade provides a perfect excuse for an alternative reserve currency to replace the dollar. China‚ Russia and other countries are already suggesting creating a “basket of currencies” that would replace the U.S. dollar.
WHOLE PAYCHECK EMPLOYEE: The quinn-oh-ah? Uh... I'm not familiar with that. Let me ask, and I'll get back to you.
When my dad and mom divorced, my dad moved in to this "singles-only" apartment community called "The Treehouse" apartments. It was newly-built, with clean walls and bitchin' green shag carpet. I remember that apartment so clearly. It was right by the pool (which I thought was awesome) and had one bedroom that was almost entirely taken up with his king sized brass bed. There was a small-ish bathroom, a dinette set with swivel chairs that had smokey gray plastic backs and white vinyl seats, and a small, galley kitchen. The living area featured a black vinyl couch and recliner, with metal studs as decorative accents, and a black and white modular plastic coffee table with matching end tables. He had a top-of-the-line television and stereo equipment, lots of plastic plants and on almost every wall: large, yarn "Eyes of God," handmade by someone he knew. Looking back, the place was tiny--maybe 750 square feet. It was so "seventies," that it's almost comical. It was his bachelor pad, and it was tacky as hell, but always spotless.
All it would have taken is for one man to stand up and say "no." All it would have taken is for one person to call the police, or the abuser's wife, or the board members of the Second Mile. They could have banned him from campus, had him incarcerated, any number of things. But they chose to ignore what was right - inherently right, and right for the children the abuser came in contact with - and ignore their own moral compasses. And then, they covered it up, ignoring the relaties for more than 12 years, allowing him to victimize countless other children. I don't care whether or not they acted within the law. I don't care if they believe they acted in accordance with university ethics guidelines. Their fear and hubris led directly to children being abused.
Christmas was so hard without you. I watched your cousin who is only three weeks older than you and wonder if you would be walking like him and if you would be getting excited the way he did and all the other things that I saw. I wonder what you would look like would it still be like me or would your looks change and you start to look more like your daddy. These are just a few of the things I think about everyday and the holidays made it harder being around everyone and seeing them with their kids and wondering why we couldnt have ours with us. Then my birthday came around after christmas and well lets just say it wasnt the best knowing that you should have been here with me well it just wasnt great. Then we have v-day and although I love your daddy more than any words could say I still wish that you were here with us to celebrate so there again it wasnt the best.
1/2c. sour cream
Chocolate, Strawberry and Cookies and Cream!
Oh, what’s that? You want more garbage comedy attempts puked out of the collective depths of the writers’ bowels? Well, how about like three different scenes of Sean Connery on a plane with the subtitle “Somewhere over the Atlantic” – which makes no sense seeing as it should only take him a few hours, and yet at least a day’s worth of events happens in the movie’s time and he still isn’t there – making chit chat with the passengers and flirting creepily with women?
Further Reading Suggestions
One thing my friend Elisabeth's dad said to me was, "no matter what, always remember to walk on the sunny side of the life! To all the best dads in the world happy fathers day!"
Thousands answered the call to protest against president Aziz in Mauritania again today. As usual, there were reports of pro-regime thugs trying to disrupt the marchers, and party loyalists making statements and issuing veiled threats in an attempt to dissuade people fro joining in.
because you have every right too.
Okay – to be honest. I went for the train. And. The brass rings. See, I have this thing with layering rings. Brass rings, to be exact. They don’t tarnish – see. I bought the two, in that there pic below. The middle ring you might recognise from here. Excuse the nails mkay. It’s all about the rings.
Classic example - little orphan Annie.
i recently got to download her first album, and wanted to share the link....you can listen to clips in the mp3 download page.....i think we'll be hearing more from this young woman.
I mean seriously...who wouldn't want a Brutal Legend RPG? This stuff is gold! Just like adventure time half the appeal is fleshing out the intriguing, huge and mysterious world that the video game created and meeting the weird inhabitants...then shredding them with lightning bolts and flaming zeppelins from the sky!! The world of Metal is an insane adventure waiting to happen.
Greek Week is in full force here at Cal Poly with different events that have been taking place since Sunday. Even more exciting, the teams are gearing up for a dance performance called “Lip Sync” that will take place on this coming Sunday, April 22nd, to wrap up the week of events. After weeks of preparation, this will be the final competition among the teams allowing them all to showcase their most talented performers.
GEORGE WK, GRANT WW, MILLER M. An influenza immunization program for hospital employees and students. J Am Coll Health Assoc 1965; 14: 97-99.
Learn what kinds of songs work well for film and TV? What are the legal issues you have to take care of before pitching? Are your recordings "broadcast quality"? What do music libraries do? How do you get to them? I'll discuss pros and cons of music libraries, music publishers, independent song pitchers and online services and how you get paid. I'll have some handouts too: Work For Hire Agreement. Royalty Flow Chart for Film/TV.
Even agents who are assigned to perform a specific task within an agency, or police personnel who are called in to assist, are mere cogs in the machinery, and are thus seldom aware of the main objective of the larger project. A large project will normally be decentralized into a number of smaller components, while the managers of each component are kept in the dark about the true goal and also the scale and magnitude of the project. In some cases the project may take many years to accomplish, as was the case with the KGB.
We knew we wanted to make a tufted headboard for her bed so me and Jon decided to go through our house/garage and see if there was anything we could use to make one.
This week I tackled a corner of the dining room. I'm working on the whole room slowly (it's almost done) and I have to post about the living room redo. Baby steps. Right now we're knee deep in swapping kids rooms - talk about an organizational nightmare!!
There is no stopping us.
I suspect that he instructs the finance department not to question the cost because he's comfortable using our service. In reality that means that he likes we drivers; we go out of our way to look after him, and he knows it. Yes, he's demanding and particular but we know how to handle him.
We felt incredibly lucky when our furniture was here by August. We had heard horror stories of waiting until October. But all our stuff arrived in great time.
From time to time I do hope to introduce you to our Belgian interior design companies.
I joyously, humbly, and thankfully accept your grace. And I offer you grace in return. Be blessed!
Now onto the formula. Once you started adding layers of the lipstick it got quite hard to work with, i ended up pushing the colour around my lips leaving me with bare patches. However i managed to get it looking ok after a bit of work. The finish was alright to start with, though not matte as Lime Crime used to claim (again i can't find it on the website but i definately remember seeing it, anyone else remember?). The main thing i notice about this lipstick is how incredibly drying it is. As soon as i put it on i just wanted to scrub it off, it felt like it was sucking all the moisture out of my lips. The worst culprit for this was Cosmopop which was as drying as Illamasqua Underworld (one of the driest and most uncomfortable lipsticks i have ever used) i managed to keep it on for about an hour because i wanted to test out it's longevity but i just had to take it off after that as it was driving me mad. You might be able to stop this problem by using a lip balm before the lipstick but i've never had to with other lipsticks so i wasn't going to give Lime Crime special treatment that i don't do with other companies. The other two were very drying and uncomfortable too but not quite as bad as Cosmopop.
And his feet, bare and still and resting,
The next reason is the brilliant soundtrack. All around, 10 Things I Hate About You is a really fun film and with the addition of “chicks who can’t play their instruments”, in the words of Patrick Verona, the film really comes alive. There is plenty of 90s chick rock playing over the top of the film and whilst this plays a small part in the story of the film it really adds to the audience’s enjoyment.
That’s something I’ll talk about some other time, though. I don’t really like to think about it, so I’m going to save it. Right now, I want to tell you, whoever you are who sees this when I show it to someone, about the Angels. I saw one of them when I went with my uncle to France, too, but it wasn’t as easy to tell. They seemed much more human. I saw them a few times, but never anywhere in particular, but I think he knew that I could tell what he was. He smiled at me, and I kind of remember him waving at me once. I saw lots of Angels when I was young, especially when my uncle took me to visit people in the hospital. As I got older, though, the Angels started to become a rare sight to see.
The quiet voice of science says there is nothing unusual or alarming about our climate. But it is drowned out by a cacophony of pseudo-science and superstition, sounded first by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) and then amplified by politicians, green activists and the media.
The secure leader is confident doesn’t need coercion to lead because they use vision, encouragement, coaching and positive confrontation. This type of leader is refreshing. They are like the fresh cool rain that relieves us from the sweltering heat of organizational pressures and stresses that come from challenges.
Wonder about that.
Well hullo!
A soldier is sent back in time for eight minute increments in order to figure out who bombed a commuter train. He also apparently falls in love with a girl that was on the train. I'm a little "meh" on this one. I know it's sci-fi-ish but come on. Eight minutes. To figure out who a bomber is? Isn't that why we have detectives and forensics? And Gyllenhaal's character adds saving a girl to his original mission. All in eight minutes? Sorry Mr. Jones, I'm not buying it. I'm sure it's an average movie, but even at this distance there are gaping holes in the plot. My guess 2 out 5
7 Rocket Tru Temper 20 oz
695. Alligator Kabob & Steak Kabob @ Tiki Bar Spring Mountain (Spring Mount, PA) 7:02 p.m.
Other than dealing with this, I've been working on orders and making cards, which I still have to photograph and list, if the sun will even peek out again. I've also been trying to tat some new ornaments, but nothing seems to be working out right. I have a large stack of twisted threads and nothing finished to show for it. If I really worked the amount of false-starts into the time it takes to create a piece when I price it, I'm underselling myself by a lot more than I already know I am.
A recent study showed that 90% of men would rather have respect than love. The same study showed that 90% of the women would rather have love than respect.
I keep this idea close to my chest and don’t show it to many people because I haven’t indulged in this degree of idealism in probably years.
Well-written books. I like a wide variety of books. I like books that take me on an adventure with characters that I can really relate to and care about. It doesn’t have to be a grand adventure, just a fun one with equal parts humor and relationships, not necessarily romance. I like stories that explore the humor and comfort of relationships without the melodrama of
Lives on his credit until Fall
The Crowd: When people first told me about the Anvil, I envisioned it as a sort of exalted cocktail mecca, the kind of tucked-away place where serious booze enthusiasts would calmly but earnestly debate the relative merits of say, shaking vs. stirring, while sipping a sazerac. It was, indeed, a cocktail mecca, but I was little off base with "calm". Shortly after it opened, the Anvil was such a scene that even earlier in the week, it was a fight to get to the bar. It was also a little bit of a pick-up bar - the sort of place where a random dude and his friends would approach you and your friends, offer to buy you a drink, and ask you if you were going to Pub Fiction after this. No, I am not going to Pub Fiction. I am going home, because it is 11 PM. On a Tuesday.
Richard Youngs, Beyond The Valley Of The UltrahitsIn retrospect, a contender for the best album of the year in 2009, in my opinion. Coincidentally, this could also be on the best reissue list, as Jagjaguwar took the CD-R from 2009 and put it to vinyl in 2010.
Away from them,
2. Back to the Gas Chamber - 03:31
43. Limp Bizkit - Gold Cobra
UK Publisher: Harper Collins
In 1949, COMMENTARY magazine, (ahem) ... "commented" on the controversy, publishing an article in the January 1949 issue titled "Comic Books and Other Horrors" by Norbert Muhlen (1909-1981), who would go on to write several important books on financial backing of the Nazi rise to power in Germany. While critical of the violence found in comic books, Muhlen was equally critical of Werthan's "evidence" and the article did not present as a support for Wertham. In the February issue, a letter from Dr. Fredric Wertham was published and followed by an answer by article author Norbert Muhlen:
Now here is one of my absolute favourite pieces of music. It has particular significance in my life and I played it many times whilst commuting back and forth to the North of England about 25 years ago. I intend writing a post about this on my other blog at some stage.
I decided to leave the bathroom window as it was for the night. If a tall, skinny burglar got in, maybe he'd open the door for me. I did pull the ladder out of the room--no point in making things too easy for the burglar.
If you're gonna have a hit
Restaurant- Golden Corral
about the new sharing site, Pinterest, I strongly encourage you to check out
4/28 – Philadelphia, PA – Temple University
Look at this silly warning I put into the book. Oh, my, the threat of having the owner mad at you is definitely incentive not to steal a book!!
In a small pan, heat up the oils. Add ginger and fry for 1-2 minutes until fragrant. Add chicken with the thick caramel and fry until seared all over. Add soy sauce, wine, sugar and water. Bring to a simmer and stir to mix. Cover with a lid and let it simmer on low-medium heat for 30 minutes or until the sauce is reduced by half. It should be slightly thickened. Add salt and pepper to taste. Dish out and serve hot with steamed jasmine rice.
To serve your turn long after they are gone,
29) Excuse me, but … would you like to see my collection of curly nose hairs?
screenshots below:
Praying for all those families affected by the storms yesterday in the south. This has been one heck of a storm season.
He Who for our sakes was partaker of flesh and blood has recovered you, and brought you back to the place whence ye strayed away, becoming mere flesh and blood by your sin.
TOMORROW: The Six Days of Darkness continue!
David Tennant's Doctor lands on Mars in 2059 at the first human colony on the planet, only to discover a lethal water-borne virus is infecting its inhabitants.
Westpac has had a bad couple of years. What with the GFC, their takeover of St. George Bank, further tightening competition in the banking sector, and their getting rid of bad debts, they only raked in a measly 6.691 billion this year after the evil government taxman stole their hard earned dollars away. With such a small profit margin it’s only natural for Westpac to cut jobs for the greater good. I mean, I can barely pay for a week’s meals with that amount of money, and I don’t feast on the platters of caviar, and Ibex liver which ensure the mental precision required to run such a successful small business as their’s.
In the Word in many passages it is said of jehovah, that he burns with anger, and is angry, and also that he consumes and destroys; but it is so expressed because it so appears to man, who turns himself away from the lord, as is the case when he does evil; and whereas on such occasions he is not heard, and is also punished, he believes that the lord is in anger with him, when yet the lord is in no case angry, and in no case consumes, for he is mercy itself, and good itself: hence it is evident what the quality of the Word is as to the letter, namely that it is according to appearance with man. In like manner, when it is said that, jehovah repents, as in what follows, when yet, jehovah in no case repents, for he foresees all things from eternity: hence also it may be manifest into how many errors they fall, who do not think beyond the sense of the letter, when they read the Word, thus who read it without doctrine from the Word, which doctrine teaches how the case is: for they who read the Word from doctrine, know that jehovah is mercy itself, and good itself, and that it cannot in any way be said of infinite mercy, and of infinite goodness, that it burns with anger and consumes; wherefore from that doctrine they know and see that it is so said according to the appearance presented to man. AC 10431.
GOD IS USING US... EACH ONE OF US... to reach families!!!
That's the evil, expansionist Russia - see how the red blob is trying to take over the world?
Translated From The Icelandic EIRIKR MAGNUSSON & WILLIAM MORRIS
After five minutes, he stopped at a restaurant for lunch. I was surprised! I didn’t know he’s bringing me to an expensive-ish place. I asked to see the menu first so I can decide. While viewing the menu, the waitress told me that the driver told her that he isn’t eating and I’ll just be paying for myself. I was relieved, and since the price looks reasonable (but still above my expectations), I decided to eat there. Apparently, this was one of those set-ups with drivers and restaurants, and as I will find out later, batik and silver shops.
The claims include assault, shootings, damage to property, police actions, vehicle accidents and legal costs.
Ok, just a sec.
Every baby goes through that inevitable developmental stage where everything and anything within reach goes directly into their mouth. I don't know about you, but watching little sharp teeth scrap away at a painted toy freaks me out. Which is why I was so excited when I found Little Sapling Toys.
Guess what? I am moving again. I found a new place that is literally across the street from work. I can walk to work. I can come home on my lunch break and see my pups and let them out. It is a lot more room and my kitchen and living room are no longer the same room. I can’t even begin to tell you how happy that makes me. And my bedroom? It has a window seat, swoon! There is a nice basement too that I already have started making plans for a yoga/meditation room. I
Ways to empower yourself, take charge of your health and spring into a new lifestyle:
So, one day, Country Boy and I grabbed our rakes, brooms, pitch forks and my face mask (later that day Country Boy wished he had brought a face mask too!) and we headed a mile down the road to the feed store to do some 'cleaning'!
The old standby of dinner and a movie is a really poor choice for a first date. How will you get to know the lady if you are sitting in a darkened theater with a movie being shown? If you choose the movie, there is probably going to be a lot of frantic car chases and a lot of blood involved. Neither are conducive to creating a memorable evening.
With understanding
The carpenter singing his, as he measures his plank or beam,
Will printed books now go the way of the vinyl LP record? A specialty item, less available and higher priced, perfect for signing and collecting but not necessarily for reading? Will the remaining bookstores (or Starbucks for that matter), offer downloads at the reading? Will that offer a better "vintage" than an e-book purchased at a differnet time online? Maybe the store will throw in a signed photo of the author.
As Obama put it recently, if the NCAA championship winners get to come to the White House, so should the best scientists and mathematicians in schools.
house pickled spicy dill fennel and cucumber
‘I felt the hook push past the bones and saw it come out on the other side. Eric slowly turned the fox, now hanging by its hind legs, a blue plastic bucket on the floor beneath its nose. A few drops of blood had already fallen in,’ she writes.
Superior – for Doors –
Before I go any further there is some SUPER exciting news I have been dying to share with you. Pumpkin Spice is going to start selling the Silhouette Cameo! Eeeeee! I have wanted one since before it was even launched!
Brads -sapphire and frost
But the Emperor's New Clothes, even if they're looking a bit faded, are still being worn nonetheless. If Sir Colin's words can help to pull away the last remaining veils of illusion and refocus us on what really matters - the deep substance of the authentic musical spirit - then I'm happy to have been a channel through which he was able to do so.
When the first Women’s Ordination Conference was being organized in 1975, the LCWR president appointed a sister as liaison to the group planning the event. The Vatican curial office overseeing religious subsequently directed the LCWR to dissociate itself from the ordination conference, but the LCWR officers refused, and the sister went on to become coordinator of the organizing task force for the event.
Looking at my husband's frustration why things like that happened unexpectedly, I thanked God that He was quick to remind us to not worry and this small problem not be used by the spiritual enemy to dampen both of our spirits. So, there we were, praying about it and committing what needed to be done under His guidance.
There upon the sand.
* He has poor listening skills. He has trouble focusing and sustaining his attention on a speaker for any length of time.
3) The period from the sin of Adam to the time God made the Sinai Covenant with Israel, is called, “from Adam to Moses,” “when there is NO law.” Romans 5:12-14. Remember also, that there were no Israelites before the flood. Abel, Seth, Enoch, Noah, Shem, and Eber were not Israelites. But the Israelites were “Eberites,” and “Shemites.” The Jews are still called the “Semitic” people.
I was determined to finish my Terrain quilt before doing anything else (I've finished the quilting and just need to put on the borders and back) but I got side-tracked ...
I adore the sweet bib detail that doesn’t lack sophistication and the subtle folds and pleating at the waist. The bib, folds and pleats stand in stark contrast to the back of the dress. The back drapes ever so gracefully, in a purely architectural way. As someone who loves textiles, the silk feels so luxuriously soft. Most importantly, the dress has pockets, which speaks to my desire for garments that satisfy form and function. The internal construction is divine.
Just look at her face while "fencing" against her older sister, lol. This is the product of watching Barbie and the Three Musketeers! Don't mess with the dress, let me tell ya! Of course I win Mother of the Year award for taking pictures instead of trying to stop the violence. LOL.
It's 2012! I thought I would begin the year by sharing a literacy activity I've been using in my class. This activity was really easy to put together and my students really enjoy it.
"He pleases because the personality his work reveals is so spontaneous, so unconstrained, so entirely natural and unaffected. And these happy dispositions of his nature reveal themselves in his work -- in his drawings by a singularly melodious and rhythmic line, in his painting by a corresponding fluency and elegance of handling. His naturalness gives him his singular charm of manner. But more than this, he has a peculiar happiness of disposition. A certain lyrical joyousness of mood predominates in his work. And this leads him to affect and enjoy what is beautiful in nature, and to express that delight in beauty in his work."
Joe Phillips, General Manager
Microwave Lemon Balm Pudding
"How are we going to introduce him to Toby?" I asked as we headed south back toward the Cities. Night had fallen, and I started to yawn. The puppy squirmed and whimpered and clawed at the side of the box, and I gently pushed him back down.
What's your favorite thing to do when it's gloomy outside?
I admit to being automatically suspicious of work that is set in a non-dominant setting using non-dominant culture when the work is written by a writer from the dominant culture. I question the motivation of the work in the first place and until I find evidence of sincerity (it’s not just being used because it’s pretty but because it really is integral to the story) I tend to carry on being suspicious. I guess, this is my anti-colonialist bias setting in.
You can’t even keep track of your own cabinet.
Video shot and edited by Baldvin Albertsson.
Character may be manifested in the great moments, but it is made in the small ones.
She placed her hands on my hips
Later I was proudly showing the Artist all I had bought, first up was the Parmesan grater that you fix over a tin, "You can just put the lid on the tin if you've grated too much," I said.
and left his quarter as usual,
My beginnings as a worker-
I have no idea where he called from - but he had been to 4000 meters and back down to sleep at 3000. So far, no altitude sickness. Even better than that...everyone is doing great! I told him I thought of him every night, alone in bed, all snugly & warm with our down-feather comforter....wondering how he was doing in his sleeping bag in the cold snow....to my surprise, and relief, he said the weather has been not at all cold! That's my 2nd biggest worry you know, that he'll be cold. The first one is not having enough oxygen....
In many countries, oranges are green, even when ripe, and are sold that way in shops. Oranges are unknown in the wild. They are a cross between tangerines and and the pomelo or "Chinese grapefruit" (which is pale green or yellow), and were first grown in Southeast Asia. There were green there then, and today they still are. Vietnamese oranges and Thai tangerines are bright green on the outside and orange only on the inside.
a swag for the front door. i see in this picture the holly is starting to curl up so it
15. Players 4.16 (63/91)
Pick a show or shows and talk about the 20th episode of their third season. And just because I want to cheat with TSC, you can also choose one other season and talk about it’s 20th episode. Do you remember how it made you feel? Was it as disappointing as TVD’s 3.20? Do you laugh now thinking about how involved you were with the show? How did your favorite character fare in the episode? How was the story? Did you feel like it was really leading up to a finale?
We were lucky enough to bring one of our original muses Jack. He is my parent’s Black Lab. He is the closest thing to a younger brother and we just adore him. When we are fortunate enough to bring him, we are all in a better frame of mind. For the most part, his day was drama free. There were a few small instances where he got a bit spooked. The first occurred when a group of Scottish bagpipes and large drums decided to walk directly in front of us. The second is when a Scottie came up to say hello and bit him directly on the nose. Needless to say, I don’t think Jack will be booking his flight to Scotland anytime soon.
26. Nice socks, can I try them on? +
Jongleurs begin play with the standard 3d8x10 gold pieces (gp). They use the Cleric Attack Table (LL p. 60) and the Thief Saving Throw table (LL p. 55).
An economics professor gives his students a stark lesson in socialism:
I’m going to save this for a later date, but one of the things I would like to discuss is one of those things we have “a long way to go on” which is the fact that people don’t like those with mental health issues to be in leadership roles or positions such as managers, or executives in general. I think that’s a mistake.
As many of you know, I make random remarks on the ever popular Facebook, and I know that many of the people on my “friends” list think I am amusing. They think my remarks “quirky” and my wit dry, but a very select few of them KNOW that there is more truth in those words than the average person would be comfortable with.
It must be a wedding. Except who gets married on a Thursday at three pm? That must be a coooold wedding party. I started to feel sorry for the bride in her white dress, resolutely setting her teeth against the shivers that wanted to crawl up her spine and worry her knees, the groom, wishing he had a wool waistcoat instead of just a cummerbund, the flowergirl pulling at her skirts and sitting down to protect her ankles.
Elizabeth Wilmshurst, former Deputy Legal Adviser to the FCO
ISBN-13: 978-1572934887
6.) On Facebook & Twitter update your status to:
Other cover:
We accept the color we can see with our eyes far more freely than the color we can see with our hearts
Also telling is the lack of any real revenge resolution. While the movie seems to be heading toward a traditional resolution where some supporting characters are killed horribly, then the bad guys get theirs and whoever’s left get a happy ending, it snaps back and reminds us that all of this is a fantasy and gives us a far more ambiguous ending set in what is presumably the real world. Most reviews that speculate on it seem to think that this is the titular sucker punch. It goes out of its way to remind us on several occasions of our own position as an audience and of the artificiality of the whole proceeding. The opening of the movie is seen through a proscenium with silhouettes who are in front of you in the virtual audience across the bottom of the screen. In several places within the film, we are placed in an audience position looking at things happening on a stage. The level 2 fantasy sequences are so ludicrous, I can’t see how anyone would take them seriously. They make no effort to justify their existence and combine every trope they could think of, even ones that make no sense together. (Poe’s law comes into effect here.) None of the characters have anything like a real name. Sweet Pea has a line at one point which seems to addressed to the audience criticizing titillation over personal investment in Baby Doll’s dance (the level 2 fantasy for our perspective). It was pretty clear to me that the whole was criticizing a certain kind of escapism even as it promoted its own brand. It’s not just another retread of The Hero with a Thousand Faces, but a reminder that things don’t actually work that way. The edifice of exploitation, where women are used for their sexuality and forced to put on a show to please loathsome men if a metaphor for the mainstream film industry.
Still on the subject of heart failure, I have tried, on two occasions, to take Ramipril. It’s not possible. It seriously impairs my breathing, and triggers asthma attacks of a severity not experienced since childhood. These persist for days after stopping the drug, before fading away.
On one of the days when she was at Sea Garden we created some plant table vignettes in the back garden.
Remember, you don't even have to wait for these items to be released! They are available NOW!
Throw everything together on a plate, add two slices of dried pineapple rings (or any other dried fruit you have) and you're all done. Depending on how "prepped" you have your fridge (veggies pre-chopped, lettuce pre-washed, chopped, and in bin, a soup on hand for emergency dinners....etc) this shouldn't take you more than 7-10 minutes. I've gotten this down to an art so that I can have a quick but healthy and nutrient-dense meal. Plus, I even give myself a dessert, which I really don't do but once a week.
(The same argument is currently used by the British National Party to argue for white Anglo-Saxon women having more children, but that’s another story.)
The Love package includes a couple’s massage from Elements Spa, dinner for two at Falls Landing, a night at The Inn on Main, flowers from Floressence and his and her gifts from Stones and Lowes. Top it off with wine from Toxaway Wine & Cheese in a picnic tote and movie tickets to the Co-Ed!
The second episode has more environments’, almost double compared to episode two which makes it a longer game. However due to it being a midquel game suffers in some areas in terms of story. That said there are several humorous moments and the development of Tycho’s backstory is very welcoming.
architecture tincture of red Arkies pinched the southern belle
Here is my Sweet and Sour Pork recipe (Pork in tomato sauce).
I wish nothing but the best for you too
"...It would be like having Asexual Apps." - Sam in class about something actually rather intelligent...
But gold will do great right? Oh, here come the people comparing recent events to the late 1970s, again completely oblivious in their abject denial of the simple realities pointed to for years by researchers who have the remarkable distinction of… accuracy! But why consider those folks when there are people on TV pointing to the light at the end of the tunnel and saying “it simply could not be a train. In fact, there is obviously no such thing as a train.”
In this post we will look at Roambi Flow, a product that lets you compose documents with interactive elements. Roambi is a set of business intelligence products by San Diego based company MeLLmo which has been designed from the ground up to take advantage of iOS features such as rich graphics and touch interface. On Roambi’s product website you will find detailed descriptions of each of these products.
to spend my last dime trying to call you
Flowers : Arcadian Collection Violaceous, Bretton Vines Script, Firefly Sandune, Coventry Rose Alla Prima, Avan Rose Alla Prima - All by Prima Marketing
I remember that when I was very young I would listen to Bessie Smith and rock back and forth like an autistic child, probably for an hour. I would replay the cut over and over until the record was worn , my little hands learning how to manipulate the needle with dexterity. The sound and feeling of the blues was like mother's milk for me.
at initial sighting
To all but a mime,
I know they will want to watch movies and play video games. Who has some ideas on other activities I can do on a budget to keep them entertained? Of course, it's going to rain all weekend, so that counts that out. I want to hear your ideas and tips on making sure these boys have fun.
No 5, Jalan Perisa 2,
Q. What was the first thing you were paid to write?
Enjoy it, dear friend. All of it. Tomorrow it will be different, and different the day after that. It is ALL meant to be enjoyed, learned from and taken in as a gift. Receive it with all of the love it was intended to give.
May Day did bring a rash of violence from somewhat minimal exchanges in NY with the biting of a cop and some vandalism to full-on riots in San Francisco and Seattle, and the bomb threat in Cleveland.
info@Emmausleeds.co.uk
At which point Prof Dawkins intervened and asked: “So by setting up the laws of physics in the first place in which context evolution takes place?”
A few seconds after that schoolteacher had said the words, I am sure he would have forgotten that he had ever said them.
Do you do it because there’s no chance in hell of that happening ever? Because you fantasize about it? Because you slobber on every magazine that even have the tiniest photo of a celebrity you fancy and don’t mind whoever sees it?
I cannot stress how much this disease has reached it's tentacles into my life in every possible way for over twenty years. Therefore, to try and completely separate it from who I am is difficult and would end up being not telling the truth and causes other, more practical challenges.
The second 'C' is courage. It is fear or insecurity that makes one resort to corruption. Then one tries to find security through money, which doesn't really happen. We have to create courage and confidence in our ability and the laws of nature.
When Heather was in grade 2 all she wanted for Christmas, was a cat.
Hours: Sunday, 11am-6pm; Monday, noon to 6pm; Tuesday, closed; Wednesday and Thursday, noon to 10pm; Friday and Saturday, 11am to 10pm.
Grade: 98
even if my three month old
We are half way through building a new chicken coop and run. We have 3 new girls to our family....Emma, Kate and Milly and a new rooster will be arriving when the coop is finished.....Alyssa and Liamm are arguing already on what his name will be :)
What are your personal expressions in relation to the Death, Burial and Resurrection of Jesus? What impact has this reality brought to your life and to those around you? The resurrection is profoundly universal, Jesus dies for the sins of the world – In what ways has this universal principle caused you to question your person public opinion? Or in what ways has the universal aspect of Christ’s resurrection prevented you from making it personal?
I am so excited to send your way the Button Buddies Kit Tutorial with bright and super cute colors that you will absolutely adore. Whether you are a beginner or have been stamping for years, this tutorial will surely delight you and your customers. I have paired it with the Petite Pairs and Brights Designer Buttons. The May Kit Tutorial consist of 4 cards and a 3-d item that will come to you in a pdf format with step by step instructions and pictures that are so easy to follow.
Paul didn’t leave anything to wonder about when he said in all these things, pretty much you name the problem you name the trial you name the distress your in. Paul said not the we would conquer not that it will happen but a distinct statement that we already are more than conquers Super Conquers. We have the victory already in Christ Jesus. When we see all that’s coming at us in the physical, mental, and emotional we need to remember the Spiritual promises from Gods word and stand on the Rock that is Chris Jesus.
On the positive side, Obama is a failure and a disaster. His approval ratings are in the toilet. Even Democrats are tired of his lunacy. The problem is, so many blind, ignorant sheep voted for him in the first place that they'll just keep on doing it because they don't know any better. The ones who voted for him because he's black will do so again for the same reason. The ones who voted for him because he's a Democrat, or because he's a union-loving Chicago commie will do so again. The ones who voted for him because they thought they were voting against Bush will sadly still be allowed to vote. The ones who are dead and voted for him will hopefully not be able to keep voting from beyond the grave as these mysterious dead Democrat voters are prone to do.
No, we have not. Except from Yongrin, we all just contributed to the songs for Dear Cloud.
Take first bite.
I have interviewed quite a few and always looking for more!
I will note that this Thursday, we’re going to start collecting eggs for incubation, as our fifteen days of rooster separation will have finally allowed us to decipher which rooster is siring which chick! I’m hoping to do regular photo updates and a guided tutorial.
Writ on the roll of time;
Your shining loyalty unflecked by doubt,
I'm finding myself in a better place every day. Slowly healing more and more from what happened. The pain will never go away completely but it's no longer the foreground of my emotions. I think I really needed this hospital visit. I needed this closure and it feels good to have it.
It seems she's found herself in some trouble. I know, she just recently arrived home, how could she have found trouble already? Well, Just like her mom has the superpower of casting guilt upon the unsuspecting, Kat has the ability to quickly find herself some trouble, no matter where she goes. Now, it seems she's found trouble that may land her in jail, or even cost her, her life.
to determine the advantage
I just wanted to take this time as I begin to work on this little blessings bedding to lift him up to the lord. So often us mommies get caught up in the "material things" which entail a child joining our families and forget what really matters. We are given the rare and brief opportunity to train a child in the way he should go, even when he is old.
I believe that one can never "get" the Age to Come, what awaits us, our true home, without falling in love with "place" on earth. It is always and only in the context of community, culture, and yes, geography, that we ever have the raw material to see beyond. We can't even envision the "homeland" of which the author of Hebrews 11 speaks without having been given the category by living in, and being removed from, a homeland on earth. The "place" of our life awakens in us the desire for its fulfillment. Our "place" teaches us what home could possibly begin to mean. It is all important that we are passionate about "place," or else we seek some disembodied spirit world that only the Gnostics could love.
About the author: James Vandenburg is a geek. He’s also a Writer, Composer, Motivational Speaker and quite often, a Philosopher. He holds Bachelor degrees in Music Theory/Composition and in Philosophy/Religion, a Master’s in Music Composition, and continues to be an eternal student of life and culture with a penchant for reading everything he can get his hands on. He’s traveled to some of the most remote places on the planet but for now, is perfectly happy living in sunny San Diego, CA.
You know him as one half of the heroic flight crew that safely ditched his French-made Airbus in the Hudson, stayed aboard until all passengers and crew members were safely out, then exited the plane.
The Good fight to preserve, to restore.
It would be interesting to know what does inspire crime readers, do they all sit around with pictures of torture and weapons on their walls, or do they look out over calming waterfalls and flying geese (real flocks, not the Hilda Ogden version) Personally were I to write a book a nice wet day would be my best inspiration, at least I live in the right country for it.
Father Christmas is a blend of many different cultures, customs, legends and mythological creatures. His earliest ancestors date back to a time when the earth was ruled by sky-riding gods, but much of his legend is based on the life of St Nicholas, a fourth century bishop from Patara, in what is now Turkey.
"The rise of splatterpunk. Discuss." (Without examples, please.)
I have got what you need…
No, I’m just not the Vegas type. I’m not into spending superfluous money, particularly not when there’s no guarantee of a return. Currently I’m completely pissed off at my money market’s poor returns, for example. So forget gambling. My interest in Las Vegas began when I visited my aunt’s family there at the age of 11. My aunt took me to the child-safe parts of the Strip: the erupting volcanoes and aquariums of The Mirage, the dueling ships of Treasure Island, the pyramid of The Luxor, the indoor roller coaster of something-or-other (which I couldn’t find on this trip). I had a ball then. Las Vegas was like Disneyland for the eyes. This time I had hoped to view it from an adult perspective. Well I got my wish, but mostly in a bad way.
Anyway, a few weeks ago in my Illo Majors Studio class we got to create a black and white illustration that would be turned into a rubber stamp. I had a hard time with this at first. I had no idea what I wanted a stamp of! But I rattled my brain and came to the conclusion that I wanted a stamp of one of my characters.
Primer really does help makeup look better, and I am so lucky that I got this for free at last year's IMATS!
Theater
Health-wise, I saw a wound care specialist yesterday. We had a great appointment and he really understands what's happening with me. He said spot on my leg that's not healing looks health enough to heal, but because of all my complications, it may take longer than expected. I'm cool with that. I feel good vibes from this dr. and know he'll do all he can to help me. The best part is he gave me compression stockings! Ohhhhhh...very oh, la, la! Only the best Italian grandma's flash those kinda knee highs! But, it will help with my poor swollen ankles and feet. One day, and it's already better. I could get on semi-normal shoes today for the first time in weeks.
The Hollywood Festival
Hey, I aim to please.
I didn't post a picture of her though, because I haven't seen her. And because last year when I posted a tarantula that was walking across my driveway, it was too freaky for people. I mean, they kind of creep me out too, but since living here, I've had to move several big females that had come into the house, and one from next door. Yeah, brave me, right? I must have been having some kind of out of body experience while doing it. My body was doing the carrying, but my mind was somewhere else, I'm sure. I have seen some really beautifully colored tarantulas though, like the one at my neighbor's house.
Examples: Baby food makers, scrap booking kits, books of kid crafts.
As it’s a bank holiday weekend, spare a thought for the people who have to work. It used to be worthwhile working on a bank holiday. Triple time or double time and a day off in the loo – I mean in lieu. Then it was dropped to double time, then time and a half and now I understand that many places don’t pay anything above the usual rate which I think is downright mean.
The next really colorful family to occupy the Mansion was the Fergusons, James E. and Miriam Amanda. “Farmer Jim” only served from 1915 to 1917, when his run-ins with the University of Texas and his shady financial deals got him impeached. The Fergusons waved their fists at the Old Guard, and vowed they’d one day return to the Mansion in triumph, riding in the same car they used to flee it in disgrace.
Home to a rules-based Penang, says CM – By K.C. Boey – March 27, 2012
I was out shopping today, trolling the remains of the reduced Christmas fare, and came eyeball to eyeball with Easter eggs, and I panicked. I have children in my life, children that need eggs buying for, and it takes time, and it takes effort, and it takes planning to get them to where they need to be around the country, and I was about to start panic-buying, emptying shelves like a pre-apocalypse looter, because I didn’t know when Easter was, no-one knows when Easter is, and then I thought: It’s January. I got home and looked it up on the calendar to find out it’s about three months off. Panic over.
Combine the onion, soy sauce, sherry, broth, garlic, hoisin, brown sugar, ginger, and pepper flakes, then put the mixture into the crock pot.
Into a responsible adult,
The long-term effects of doing this are absolutely astounding. Imagine having thousands of prospects, in your target market, receiving your monthly newsletter. They will appreciate the useful content you will provide, and the best part is that your name will be constantly in their minds as the only person to buy from when the time comes! By publishing a quality newsletter, you are no longer just a salesperson in their eyes – you become a highly qualified expert in your field, they will begin to trust you as a business advisor, and that is what the very top of the top sales pros are to their customers.
Professional designers:
In most cases it takes time to process information that user has submitted. At the backend there could be a no of systems involved in processing the information. This should be taken into account and properly handled. There are two main way to handle it:
So today, the Slog asks a simple question: if Channel Four was forced to hive off Jon Snow and his 4News co-conspirators, does Jeremy ‘Basil Brush’ Hunt think that anyone would have difficulty discerning Four’s socio-political bias?
And today is the first day of the sneak peeks.
Yet it is not even the iPhone but another product – the iPad that caused a real revolution. Tablets were thought to be made for professionals architects or designers but apple managed to convince everyone that it is essential for them. It is common opinion that iPad is basically 4 iPhones joined together. Whether it is true or not, global market consists in 75% from the iPads and every new generation is long awaited.
For more information about The Natural Sapphire Company visit www.naturalsapphirecompany.net
The biggest story by the media Vultures involves our captain, El Capitan. They always feed us with clichés that Barca will do this and Barca will do that but they have decided to switch over to their rivals, Real Madrid. They report that the 9-time Champions League winners are willing to offer us £35m for his services but should they sign Nuri Sahin of recent Bundesliga champions Dortmund, they’ll tell us to ‘fuck off’ politely. If the combined crappiness combo of Milner and Torres could command £85m, Arsenal’s captain should be worth at least more than half of these two players equating a starting price of £42.5m. Even though if the info sounds crappy, I’m sick and tired of teams talking too much and unsettling players when they can afford them. I have a slight hunch that the prospect of being a Barcelona player fucked Fabregas’ psyche in the early part of the season so he struggled with form. Look at our Blue neighbours Chelsea; on the last day of the winter transfer window, Carlo the Cannibal told his boss that he needed to sign just two players that would help his cause. Out of the blue, £71m surfaced from nowhere and the Italian manager signed Torres and David Luiz. If a club brings £71m for Fabregas, I’m pretty sure that Mr. Kroenke and Mr. Gazidis would choke on their wine and hold a serious meeting with AW. In Football Manager, your board won’t even give 2 fledgling fucks about you before selling the player off.
Dr. Nell gave one more scan over the five reclined drones in his Sickbay before returning the medical tricorder to the nurse. He turned to Three-Twelve, who was lying on her back next to Seventy-one. Both had the fingers of their right hand resting on a pressure pad beside their beds.
Trusting that it is enough.
Polli is an Australian-based company that is known for its unique and contemporary jewelry, homewares, and decorations. My sister first introduced me to their metal jewelry many years ago and I instantly fell in love with their fun and beautifully intricate designs. I’m currently obsessing over their fox earrings (how cute are those??) and the tandem pendant (such great details), but, really, their Web site is filled with so much eye candy that it’s nearly impossible to make a decision as to what I want to get next. I’m sure, after a quick browse, you’ll be hooked, too!
If you are a fan also of this film, please let me know.
“Republicans want the gays to suffer because they can’t get married! Homophobe.”
I headed to the theater to pick it up, expecting all of the cash, etc. to be missing, but sweetbabyjeebus, it was all there! In tact!! I couldn't believe it!
With just under two months now until the country Living Spring Fair much of the focus at Whinberry & Antler is now on preparing for the event and trying to ensure that things can go as smoothly as possible (chip and pin, insurance, company sign, displays, transport etc) My handbook came in the post this morning and there certainly is a lot to read.
5 What's It Gonna Take? 3:55
jctrois.com
For a show like HLN’s “Prime News”- I’m provided with Cindy the make up artist and sometimes a town car. Those are the best days for obvious reasons.
Is there an activity you enjoy that takes you away from it all? I’d love to hear about your favorite adventures in the comments section!
Group JYJ’s member Kim Junsu is producing his first solo album after debut.
What a massive week it's been!
So you have actually raised up your head, just high enough, to ask God to help you, because when we pray to a saint, we are only praying (asking, petitioning) for the saint to pray to God with you, for you.
Just a quick post on the latest conference realignment nuttiness. I couldn’t resist…
Here I am, I'm not lost. Don't ask me where the time has gone. We all got an extra day but it flew by just like the rest of them do. Was going to write on the 1st as that was my daughter's birthday, but that has come and gone!!!!
Most people really do not like these models due to the claws and such, however I think that they beautiful models. So full of character, and different from many of the sculpts past and since.
Not much lurking in my head today yet. Swirling around the edges are the ideas for the Dale Arden story, but I’m not quite ready to go there yet. I wanted to write just another blah blah blah blog entry, see what’s cooking in the ol’ noodle. I don’t know if I’m ready to get down into the sex talk that’s actually on my mind, now that I’m looking at it. If I write about masturbation I may not publish it. Yes, shy about something at last. Hard for me to get off since the surgery. If there’s any one downer it’s that. But the fact that my circuits work at all is good enough. It was a year after I had the operation before I had another orgasm. You’d think it was a big deal, as in “loss and tragedy” but no I’d really thought about it first and it was a price I was willing to pay. I’m glad I didn’t have to pay more of one.
"You want me to eat grass?! I'm a dog of breeding, I don't eat common grass!"
I had especially wanted to check out the new roof exhibit at The Met: Big Bambu, by twins Mike and Dough Starn. We followed at least five different guards instructions until we were pointed to an entirely different line to the left of the one we had just waited in. I didn't feel like standing around again but excited to get the hot tickets to the event. Luckily, someone standing ahead of us showed us the TWO PAGE long list of rules (which none of the guards had told us about) including the fact that we couldn't wear flip flops. As it was summer in New York, Priyanka and I were both, predictably, bearing our pedicured toes. Saddened ,we got out of line and headed to the roof anyways, only to meet more "Don'ts", "Stops" and "You Can'ts" on the roof. Hilariously the full title of the piece is "You Can't, You Don't, and You Won't Stop" I think maybe they should have taken out the last "you won't".... But really, I know it's art and we want to preserve it and the met wants to relinquish any responsibility but it just felt like it took so much away from what was a really wonderful, wild, frantic, improvisational work. I wanted to dance around the piece, to climb on it, to lay on it, to experience with every sense. So many rules seemed to kill the growth and I had to wonder if such restrictions were what the seemingly playful artist's truly would have wanted.
I am still getting tutts from the hubby....
“Exactly right”, you might say. This first remake made a big point of being inspired by the much-loved Bill Bixby series of the ’70s and ’80s, even having the long-dead actor himself make an appearance. It was, indeed, a far superior movie to the much-maligned Eric Bana version. The monster was terrifying, and the man tried to keep him caged at all costs.
“Pray as often as you can as pray changes everything”
B2. You Can Choke Like That
Mix it and stir it and seal it with the first sincere kiss
hope you'll enjoy each and every project along the way!!
Note: I recently made this Classic Chocolate Cake for my sister's birthday and had some leftover dark chocolate. So instead of using chocolate chips, I just chopped up the dark chocolate to bits and used them instead.
I was under the impression that even authors published by standard companies had to do much of the legwork.
absolution, papal - ix
How many 12 yr old do you know that can build a tree house from scratch?
Without waiting for it to happen, I am willing to predict that some “pundits” will proffer the notion that trying Senussi is somehow contrary to the notion of “healing” Libya. Senussi was part of the very disease that made Libya so sick during the reign of Qaddafi and his murderers. Trying Senussi does not block Libya’s so far mostly imaginary progress toward achieving civilization. Undoubtedly, a few will argue that it’s “too late” and that it’s time to “leave the past in the past, etc.” But I would ask of them the same question that I would ask of those who wanted Demjanjuk “left alone.”
Little Miss 3 was ill with a mysterious stomach thing, yet no real symptoms but lethargy and little appetite.
Jeter is a good dog. He came to us through one of those Sunday morning emails that you are not supposed to open. The subject line was something like “Dog to be put down unless…” The rest of the statement was in the body of the email, sent by my travel agent who cannot help herself when there is an animal to be adopted.
That picture was taken just after it was sanded. Bridget at first said she wanted a bright blue and we were going to add red or coral knobs as we were coordinating with fabric she had. Then she emailed me and said she was thinking about the darker coral and wanted to know what my thoughts were... I said, "YES!"
I'm going to tackle these 3 outfits at once today, because I feel they all have a common thread. I'm going to dub this look, "Martha Hides Her Figure." Now I happen to know from some of the other photos she sent that Martha has a terrific figure; however, my readers would be hard pressed to know it from these outfits. It occurred to me earlier today that although there was a long list of qualities Martha mentioned she was looking for in a wardrobe, 'sexy' was not among them. I'm going to take the liberty of adding it to the list, and try to gently steer this look in a more flirty direction.
“Open-access (OA) literature is digital, online, free of charge, and free of most copyright and licensing restrictions. OA removes price barriers (subscriptions, licensing fees, pay-per-view fees) and permission barriers (most copyright and licensing restrictions).“
“Aside from irradiated fuel, almost all of Hanford’s plutonium inventory is in the Plutonium Finishing Plant (PFP). There are more than 3,000 containers of plutonium oxides, 370 metal items, somewhat more than one thousand containers of plutonium scrap, and about 250 bottles of plutonium solution.” (Section II-B).
"But you'll sting me!" said the frog.
1 - On arrival to the airport in the UK, when asked to present their passports, some ladies found themselves in a sticky situation as they claimed they were not reminded to bring their passports and thought that they didn't need them.
Have all my human senses lied
A hospital is never my idea of a good time, and my husband feels even more strongly about that than I do. He did his first ever overnight stint in a hospital on Sunday.
– St. Anna Rosa Gattorno
In one Texas case, Benjamin Herbert Boyle was executed in 1997, more than a year after the Justice Department began its review. Boyle would not have been eligible for the death penalty without the FBI’s flawed work, according to a prosecutor’s memo. At the federal level, the decision whether to notify defendants in old cases of possible forensic errors resides with prosecutors. Perhaps predictably, among US Attorneys, "The Post found that while many prosecutors made swift and full disclosures, many others did so incompletely, years late or not at all." We see the same types of disparities in Texas state courts. In some instances, as in El Paso, the DA promptly notifies the defense bar when problems are discovered. In others - the Harris County BAT van fiasco comes to mind - prosecutors can be intensely reluctant to open such a can of worms.
Add chopped fruit to a large serving bowl. Pour wine and honey over fruit and toss to incorporate the flavors. Let sit for thirty minutes. Garnish with almonds or walnuts and serve. You can serve this in pretty dessert cups. Be sure that each serving gets a splash of the wine/honey dressing.
The result of that trauma is that I only go to the dentist when the pain is so bad it outweighs my fear…like today.
The definition of balance, or rather choosing which items are most important to us, constantly changes. If we discover an addictive sport or hobby we immediately find a way to include this newfound passion in our lives while still attempting to maintain the sense "balance" we had beforehand. If you're like me and find new interests all the time, the number of things you're attempting to fit in to your life keeps growing. Just thinking of how you're going to try and balance everything can get overwhelming.
There is a subtext to the show, however, and with the added context of the gallery setting, the show becomes another enterprise entirely. The fact is you don’t exactly know where to stand in Attoe’s show? Is Attoe unapologetically blue collar, making art when he returns from the factory or the bar, and his gaggle of mullet headed kids are asleep (I use archetypes not because I believe them but because Attoe seems to). Does he believe in this way of life, does he respect it in any way?
Yup, it's just like it sounds. Epic has taken a classic Belgian style golden ale and corrupted it with a little American-style-bending-flair to produce something akin to a Belgo-IPA.
Well, she is in our hearts and on our minds this week as she under takes this...
“I got to thinking,” Pete said, “what if this is just an advance party? What if these guys are part of a larger group?”
20. Chain 4, treble crochet in same stitch as chain 4, chain 2, 2 treble crochet again in same stitch, *skip 5 stitches, make cluster in next stitch* (cluster = 2treble crochet, chain 2, 2 treble crochet), repeat around, join to top of beginning chain 4. (72 clusters) NOTE: I found that for the last 8 clusters I had to skip only 4 stitches between each cluster to end up with 72 clusters. Adjust as you need to obtain 72 clusters.
Bobby who I had the wonderful chance to meet and cuddle and who I know needs a family quickly! What a wonderful son he would make too! His Reece's Rainbow profile can be found here or if you want to read about my time with him visit this post!
Overall, Last Sacrifice was purely amazing! Probably my favorite in the series. So much was put at stake and I was honestly surprised at how Rose handled it, her character has grown so much! I have to give props to Richelle Mead for being such an excellent writer, she created such an amazing storyline that will surely win her new readers for years to come. I absolutely cannot wait to see what she comes out with next. Lucky for us, she will be starting a new young adult spin-off series titled Bloodlines that will follow some more minor characters in the Vampire Academy series. So for those of you who can't say goodbye, be sure to check this one out.
I’m sure every runner has heard to it, it’s Born to Run by Christopher McDougall. This is book is awesome, and so inspiring! An extra connection I have with it is that I’m originally from Mexico, from the state where the Tarahumaras live. I grew up seeing them in town and in the mountains, I know some the raramuri words that are mentioned in the book, I’ve been to several of the places the author visits. It’s a great read, I really recommend it.
2 tablespoons unsalted butter
Outstanding Supporting Actor in a Comedy Series
That's it, one card and I'm pooped. Back to the armchair with a cup of tea I think.
Why go into all this now? Over the last few years a shadow has been growing in the East. We’ve heard various reports that Luserke is again asking writers and artists if they need representation. (Here's one recent example. Here's another.) Writer Beware has received a handful of questions about Luserke from writers who've been approached by him. And it was just discovered, as part of SFWA’s Estates Project, that Luserke is listed as the agent of the estate of one well-regarded author.
Sunday, I was going to pick up Adrienne from my mom's. Russ had talked to his buddy and they were going to go out on his boat to go fishing. I was fine with that since I wanted him to be able to use his fishing pole that he hadn't been able to use yet. As I was getting ready to leave to get Adrienne, Russ called and said they were on their way back. He wasn't feeling well at all and needed to go the ER. So I took him. He couldn't even walk in the door. He collapsed in the parking lot and they had to come out and get him up in a wheel chair. After more than 2 hours int eh waiting room of him crying, having chills and hot flashes, and throwing up from the pain they finally call him back. I had to help him back in the wheel chair and I had to wheel him back and help him onto the bed. The doctor came, told Russ he was in pain and gave him a shot and said go see a doctor tomorrow go home.
I took a few minutes to pick my middle kids up from school and to cool off a bit.
What is the role of quality standards in waterproofing materials and solution and also tell us what are the systems placed in your company to ensure quality standards?
Nicole's ceremony was so beautiful. The service she and her husband planned was filled with elements of nature, spirituality, solemnity and humor. I had shivers through most of it. During the handfasting itself, I played the Irish song, "Give Me Your Hand." Sniff, sniff.
It has been such an exciting week in the Little Kitchen! There is news to be told!! While baseball is still officially the Boy's first love, in the wake of his injury, he has been exploring other options. He came upon an exciting endeavour being offered by his school through EFtours. After much thought and discussion, we have decided that this opportunity now in front of him to just too good to pass up. I am so excited, I can barely contain myself....The Boy is going......to......KENYA!!!! He will be participating in a voluntour with Free the Children and the Me to We people!!!!!!!!!! What a fantastic opportunity for young people! The itinerary looks amazing! He also gets to go to WE day this week as well!
It is the distillation of all her words of wisdom - and how many of them there have been and still are - on her Help I Need a Publisher blog: http://helpineedapublisher.blogspot.com
As we walked back towards the agricultural shed where we store our machinery, I mentioned to Gérard that all that remained to be tidied up was the field nearest the shed. I verbally patted him on the back and waxed lyrical on the great progress we have made over the years clearing up such a neglected property. I basked in my reminiscences and recollections, reminding him of how our farm once looked. As we moved closer towards the shed he became quieter, almost sheepish. I still, naive woman that I am, hadn't put two and two together....Can you guess? Are you more in tune with 'French farmer logic' than me?
I’d like to point out as well, that Wodehouse’s comical and trivial account of life as a wealthy, happy-go- lucky loafer comes hard on the heels of WWI. The caricatures that dance through the sunlight of Wodehouse’s 1920 are recognizable types, but they are creatures of fancy with none of the concerns or sorrows of that era. I think that is one reason Wodehouse was and remains so popular. Through these lovable buffoons, we can, for a moment live in a world untroubled and entertaining. A world that promises that Our Man Jeeves can Get Us Through. And that is not such a bad place to escape to, after all.
I MUST EAT PASTRY
Here are the design team cards made with fun digital stamps from Cardmadfairy and Stamp Fairy to inspire you. To see the details on the cards or to visit the design team blogs, just click on their names.
For this, Thou shalt not commit adultery, Thou shalt not kill, Thou shalt not steal, Thou shalt not bear false witness, Thou shalt not covet; and if there be any other commandment, it is briefly comprehended in this saying, namely, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself.
and to use the parts.
His unconventional political manifesto states that ‘the majority’, as defined by the government of the day, is always right.
"I firmly believe that any man's finest hour, the greatest fulfillment of all that he holds dear, is the moment when he has worked his heart out in a good cause and lies exhausted on the field of battle-victorious."-Vince Lombardi
IMATS (International Makeup Artist Trade Show) is for people involved in the makeup or creative industry, it is however also open to the public so anyone can go, they hold it once yearly normally towards the beginning of the year here in the UK and takes place all around the word at different times. It is most definitely a make-up lover’s dream event. There are a host of high end and in most cases designer makeup brands on show with many giving up to 75% discount on products. It is also a great opportunity to meet others in the Makeup industry, see live demonstrations of new products and to get your hands of some much sought after products.
And to show this isn’t just a piece of random eclecticism, the AIA’s first campaign is one dear to my heart – getting self-published authors a higher profile at festivals – I think we can all say amen to that!
Time: 7.00PM
Memories are anchors left behind long after fate disengages the ship’s tenuous hold on the shore and steers it reluctantly away, away from the shore, away from those it anchored, away to the deep sea, to the great beyond from whence there’s no return.
She's seen you in some situations
I was perusing Twitter and saw many people stating that they were FitFluential Ambassadors. Now, not knowing what this was, I looked it up. I found an application process and I had to send an e-mail telling them why I thought I was best qualified to represent my area.
Jesus is at work today, he speaks on our behalf to God.
them should they get lost at an age too young to
However, to submit through fear or because of fraud is not to consent, and no matter how many times our abusers tell us we were asking for it, the truth is we were not. As a nation we never consented to what has been done to us, we were merely never permitted to say NO.
even if only in my bitter musings.
When all the love in the world is right here among us
This is an easy one to address. I haven’t seen it being seriously argued anywhere lately, which might mean that it’s finally sinking in what nonsense it is, but maybe I’m just looking in the wrong places. Either way, it doesn’t take much to understand why the theory of evolution is in no way refuted by the second law of thermodynamics.
We are once again appalled at the incompetence of front line workers incapable of appreciating the importance of proper placement of decimal points and making accounting mistakes that have resulted in wasteful overspending.
I wonder if he’d understand the joke if I told him about the mouse running across the rail tracks and getting a chunk of its tail caught under the wheels of the train that came along and severed off. The mouse turned around to investigate the incident and the train ran over its neck and cut off its head.
“But I don’t ever see you go to work.”
Hi ladies, back to reality for everyone today?
Which explains why I saw "Kangaroo Jack." And yes, it was as bad as you thought it might be. But I'm sure I enjoyed the popcorn before my eyes started bleeding.
I numbed her up prior to doing the repair as she was feeling some 'stinging'. The repair was pretty straightforward and simple but she almsot immediately starts asking how long it will take. I tell her that this is something she doesn't want me to rush!
As you can see, I had quite a mess because I decided to pull all the yarn out of it’s nice little roll so that I could cut it off: I do not recommend this! It got all knotted and messy and would be much easier if you just pulled it straight from the little ball of yarn. (See, you can tell I’m not a knitter, I don’t even know what to call the ball of yarn.)
I’ve not written a pub review in a while, simply because I had nothing to say on the matter. The Hunter’s has improved so much, it’s a little beacon of hope for a time when the pub trade seems to be in a bad way. Put it on your beer map – it’s a worthy destination. There’s also an excellent farm shop next door if you need something for tea on your back home.
” Frankie was part of the Buffalo, N.Y. trio that came downstate to the big city along with Jerry Bledsoe, and Imhotep Gary Byrd. They had enough foresight to swoop down from the most Alaska-like part of NY State and make a major impact on radio back then. The singer Rick James was also from up there and they all were close friends.I wanted to be just like Crocker, especially when I heard the kind of money and perquisites that would come my way if I were successful. I finally knew what I wanted to be; not a schoolteacher in the classroom sense, but one who dropped the science on the box like Frankie did! As I write these words, I wonder what I was thinking if I was thinking at all, but more importantly I ask myself why I wasn’t even more aggressive in trying to attain it. Many brothas who grew up back then in New York’s five boroughs suffered from the Frankie Crocker syndrome, and that is nothing to be ashamed of.It was about intelligence inside of the music and not being afraid to be controversial. Like the interviews he did during his show with the major acts, and being a cool pro even when they didn’t go all “nice-nice” as in the famous Isley Brothers chat where something he said insulted them and they walked off the show in mid-stream. I incorporated that feature into my ensuing years on the radio. Love or hate him (the latter was often because of jealousy), if you ever heard “the Chief Rocker” on the radio, you know what I mean. He was also one of the first to transition his radio act to television by hosting a show styled after the Hullabaloo, Shindig and Bandstand shows of the day. By the late 1980s though, it seemed that he had fallen out of favor for the final time at Inner City Broadcasting even though he would have two more “comeback” stints on WBLS. He was eventually silenced by those in power who cut him in spite of their faces, and their noses began to grow when the listening public asked, “Where was Frankie?” He ended up something like many a sports hero near the end of their careers: “retiring” and “UN-retiring” many times. ~
I did it…this morning, I “ripped off the band-aid” and got my first team teaching session of Body Pump out of the way. The first attempt at anything is always the worst, and I find it is best to just do it and get it over with…kind of like quickly ripping off a band-aid.
The Chinese in India number roughly only 20,000. This number does not include Mainland Chinese students, visitors, businessmen,etc but refers to those Indian-Chinese with Indian nationality. They mainly concentrate in Kolkata (Calcutta) and currently own tanneries, restaurants, sauce-making factories, and dentistry. At the height of Chinese migration, during WW2 (to escape the Japanese invasion of China at that time) there were around 50,000 Chinese living in Kolkata. But then numbers dwindled after the Sino-Indian War of 1962. Many Indian-Chinese migrated to countries such as Canada, UK, and Australia. I have met someone whose mother had migrated from India to Canada before, when i was volunteering at the Sydney Intl' Film Festival...
Centre of Pressure (CofP) is the balance of downforce at the front and rear axles. As such it’s analogous to being the aerodynamic equivalent of Longitudinal CofG (balance of mass between the axles). CofP is also known as termed as aero balance.
I like Charles’ thoughts on getting older, when he says, “I used to think that age ripened us … But that is not what happens. We do not ripen like a peach. We grow hard in some places, soft in others. We are inflexible where we should yield, and we give way where we should hold fast.” (p. 230)
Veterans of the conference grumbled about 1. how it’s too big now, 2. how it’s changed, and 3. how SXSW’s early EPs were much better before they signed to the Warped Tour and totally sold out, man. This was only my second year, and even I could feel how many more people there were this time.
Senior donors had themselves warned Feldman against appointing both men.
“Kris is eager for Khloe and Lamar to do another season of their reality show, but Khloe has been telling her that she is not sure yet.
The only rule is, Suffer the pain.
As Commander of AFMC, Janet–er, I mean General Wolfenbarger–will be responsible for the research, development, test and evaluation, acquisition management services (buying and paying for weapons systems), and logistics support for all the weapons systems in the Air Force. You know, things like unmanned drones, star wars missiles, F-22s, and cell phones. That is a lot of responsibility and a lot of people as well as machinery.
Dance: Samba
Though the song is not about Nikki Sixx, I did use his name in the lyrics.
The management and team at Sonaisali Island Resort and World Resorts of Distinction (WRD) are very pleased to announce the appointment of Clair Abot as the new WRD Business Development Manager for North America. Claire, in her new role will represent both Sonaisali Island Resort & Tadrai Island Resort, Fiji in the North American market.
Dr Guriqbal Singh Jaiya from WIPO was the next speaker, who had come all the way from Geneva to be with us. Director of SME division until December 2011. He considered that a major challenge of IP is that it is seen as esoteric subject that is the exclusive province of small group of IP lawyers. He also saw the balance of IP as being multifaceted with many stakeholders, and asked how the benefits of creativity should be allocated. He referred to a number of recent high profile deals involving IP where patent portfolios have changed hands for very high sums, thus showing the potential high value that can be attached to intangibles. The question then, however, he considered, is how that high value should be distributed among stakeholders.
The market is a potentially lucrative one, Pieter Verkade, an executive at the MTN telecommunications company, told Africa Renewal. Such transfers already are “a well-beaten track, with a lot of migrant remittance money coming into Africa for some time through other channels.”
Mr. Goldsmith was always nice to me. Buying advertising on a Junior Achievement radio program isn’t really advertising, more like a charitable contribution. I didn’t understand the distinction then, but I appreciated Mr. Goldsmith’s loyalty. I also appreciated the way he treated me, like an adult, a fellow business person, not like a kid. He did it in a matter-of-fact way that was still unusual to me, at age 16.
I expect that you are all wondering what it is like to go through radiation treatment.
Me and Jae have been working this lane of short-time hotels and low-end girly bars for a while now. We got it down like the movies. It’s easy to spot the farangs in rentals and then we just have to take diggers. We practice our diggers on the beach. Tourists take pictures of us practicing down there, is how good we are.
I’ve seen Georgia-Georgia Tech games get out of hand, but I’d never seen a Yellow Jacket team quit before. Until this one.
The first 24 hours at starbase have been relatively uneventful. We have received a number of visiting delegations but otherwise nothing major of note. Subject continues to be relatively passive. She has emitted 2 distress signals to date which were both curtailed through provision of sustenance.
Maida - 2 1/2 Cups
5/23 – Brooklyn, NY @ Music Hall of Williamsburg
Then, music.
“Guaranteed” National Park at Scotland – It doesn’t exist!
I’m choked beneath society’s conceptual thumb.
Get your Christmas shopping DONE this week so you can enjoy and relax through the holidays! HUGE selection of ALL THINGS CHRISTMAS! Like new and vintage items that you’ll love!
So today, once again, no one happened to be close by when I opened the back door. Since they leave my chair at the back door for me, I thought I’d try it once again by myself. It is a simple thing to holler “Hello” and someone would come help me, but I guess I was too “proud” to ask today! So, as I was trying to sit, I lost my grip on the leather seat, the chair moved away from me, and I was dumped unceremoniously onto my rear in the floor! Thank goodness we have a very strong young man working in our kitchen. He was able to pull me to a standing position and help me into my chair. What a way to start my day! I learned a lesson today. I can’t be afraid to ask for help when I need it even if I am afraid others are getting tired of having to help me! “Pride goeth before a fall” never had so much meaning before today.
Maybe even hate you
Your passion, when fully focused on, directs strong energy for creating and fulfilling your heart’s desire.
(TriQuarterly, an imprint of Northwestern University Press) - Interview
So that means I gotta carry around my big ol wallet with me everywhere. So that takes up one arm.
"Amoco, usually," I replied.
Although we call this a "blog party," It is absolutely perfect to use an online gallery for your linked entry if you don't have a blog. It doesn't have to be the Waltzingmouse Stamps Gallery, either (although you are more than welcome to link up as many Waltzingmouse Stamps projects as you like there). If you post your card somewhere on the web, we'll be happy to visit you!!! Flickr-Picasa or other online gallery is also fine. It’s wonderful if we can leave comments but no worries if that option isn't available in the posting option you choose.
Grade 12 students are reminded to completer the Service Award form.
This is my favorite photo, I love how the Sushi guys dressed in traditional garb was doing this plating. Arranging in floral patterns and some placed nicely in fried wonton cups. I didn't get to try it but my gosh it looked yummy! Pretty!
Some terrific support en route with some good friends along the way.
Bath Time X's Four
In 1997, deep sea microphones captured a loud and unusual sound, dubbed a Bloop in Earth’s Pacific ocean.
I’d never heard anything like it. From there, of course the next
The tent on Groenplaats last weekend truly was a cathedral for beers, proving that passion for greatness did not stop with Rubens in the Scheldestad.
One thing I don’t like about HIMYM is the fact that they air so many new episodes in a row early in the season. Why is this a problem? Because it means many gaps between them now, in the final episodes.
The new government of Prime Minister Mariano Rajoy has been battling to overhaul the euro zone’s fourth-largest economy since it came to power in December, pushing through draconian budget cuts, labor-market reform and a plan to clean up its struggling banks.
b) You're posing a question. Making them think you give a shit about what's coming out of her mouth. Therefore letting their guard down from your scummy tactics.
“Sheikh Ayman al-Zawahiri has regional leaders in Iraq, Afghanistan, and sub-Saharan Africa,” Rage added. “Here, where we are today, we will strengthen the unification of the mujahideen fighters.”
a highway for our God.
The hardest thing to do is to open up knowing that nobody cares.On the other hand I couldn’t care less.
- S$17 for senior citizens (aged 55 years and above)
And those values don't change as the years pass along
WHY do the chairs not move in the Celebrity Apprentice in the Board Room?
Postmaster
Both saints and vikings are long dead, so you’d think this was a close call. While the final score was indeed tight, you have to consider that, on average, Nordic seafarers of the tenth century have been dead longer than most saints, and that increased decomposition time is sure to play havoc on endurance, especially in the fourth quarter. And if they were both alive, the Saints have good on their side, while the Vikings had mostly herring going for them.
I love my mother. It’s important that I lead with that, lest you think the following contents of this post mean that I hate her. I most definitely do not. Once upon a time, my mother and I were as close as night and day.
I can tell you that a lot of the romance editors also rep YA and they might be moved to violence if just one more YA paranormal romance lands in their submission inbox.
A specialist popular music important factors independently will be touching susceptible plus you can find your specialist major which will fuses through popular music style so that you can communicating style within the touching with control key.Samung F500 options your swivelling demonstrate display screen which will lets flicks to generally be perceived around panoramic mode plus is definitely the first mobile handset so that you can comprise of aid designed for DivX training video codec.
With some blocks of town almost devoid of inhabitants, it might be cheaper to offer the few people left some Land Bank property in a more populated part of the city. Then, the city would be free to declare the cleared area a green zone of sorts, cut sewer service and stop maintaining the streets.
Here’s a delicious breakfast that I made myself this morning. I call it Pineapple Pork Scramble.
Well that was nice of her wasn't it?
"But YOU AREN'T SUPPOSE TO KATIE!", Natalie screamed.
The other side of the coin is that you don't know how to rate praise from someone until you know what else they like. I've lost count of the number of fan e-mails I've had that say "You are my second favourite writer after X" where X = someone like Christopher Paolini!
I grew concerned with increasing aspects of my girth
But soon found him,
According to Aristotle the best government is one with just laws, an aristocracy and the society has a strong middle class.
*** I forgot to bring my camera that day so all pictures were taken with my colleague's Canon digital cam.
So Jesus' first instruction is this: Don't ignore the sin. Your first duty is to let them know (as graciously as possible, as you would have them graciously rebuke you!)
The new rules basically say that the Trustee must make an annual declaration of the trust assets and that these will be considered part of the estate of the French resident, for income tax, wealth tax and inheritance tax, unless it can be shown otherwise.
Yes, I participate in reading challenges. It's a love/hate thing for me. One, I don't have the time to re-read my favorites but, two, I find so much to enjoy that I wouldn't have read on my own.
So what changed in those 5 years? Certainly not hemp, exactly the same resource extraordinaire that has served humanity for at least 12,000 years. Priorities changed, propaganda changed. And hemp didn’t change when the war ended and hemp reverted to our enemy. You might wonder, whose enemy?
only to feel like I failed.
I had a productive day yesterday. I feel like my crafting mojo is coming back. :) About time too I say!!! :) I made 7 cards yesterday and thought I'd share couple of them with you today.
That last part is a joke. Don’t ever buy me pants.
1. Read your Bible — Satan cringes every single time you open it because he knows the power we can find in its pages.
There's a stark contrast between judging in America and over here, which I wrote a piece on for the British Guild of Beer Writers newsletter and have pasted below, however, I'm also struck by the fact that I feel slightly uncomfortable with the concept of tweeting during the judging process.
He was just like a bulldog, he wouldn't turn loose;
SHAMROCK Stir one part Irish whiskey with one part dry vermouth, three dashes of green Chartreuse and three dashes of green crème de menthe.
At the macro level, it’s a bit more complicated. I think there is a great amount of ‘path dependency’ whereby a scion gets a major head start. Given the existence of dynasty prior to their arrival, people like Rahul Gandhi or Tarique Rahman are default party leaders. They have to screw up badly for someone else to get a chance. Perhaps more ‘activist’ leaders at the micro level would increase the chance of such leaders breaking through to the national scene.
(BLDGBLOG owes an enormous thanks to Mike Davis for his time, patience, and willingness to see this discussion through to completion. All drawings used in this interview are by Leah Beeferman – who also deserves a big thanks. And if you missed part one of this interview: here it is).
I did, however, get pretty frustrated with the resistance around here. Let me just confirm that this was not about meat or no meat, or vegetables vs no vegetables. This has never been an issue, and I am proud to say that my children eat almost anything. No, this issue was solely about breakfast (paleo breakfasts can consist of things that especially my daughter will not touch for breakfast) and snacks. After all, the world is full of sugary, floury deliciousness. And well, yes, it's great that mom is feeling so much better these days. Hooray for her. But please, leave us kids alone with this paleo stuff.
Smells bigger than many lagers too, it's got a solid malt smell while keeping the spicy smell that warmers need.
We talked and watched tv for a couple of hours, and then he left.
J: Your Jesus talking in parables has nothing to do with any of the things I mentioned. All of the things I mentioned were from the Old Testament, such as the creation of the universe in six days. Jesus was not in the Old Testament and had nothing to do with the examples I listed.
Kofi Annan, former U.N secretary general was quoted in a recent New York Times article describing this new influx of Hedge Funds as a new “scramble for Africa,” recalling European colonization of the continent in the 17th and 18th century. “We have seen a scramble for Africa before, and I don’t think we want to see a second scramble of that kind,” Annan said. “If the food security of the countries, rather than profiteering is not the main goal, it is straightforward exploitation.” In fact, the Oakland Institute cited multiple accounts where families were forcibly removed from their ancestral lands and livelihoods, often with little or no compensation to make way for export commodities, such biofuels, and cut flowers.
is first of all to sense them through the strings;
Cook about 3 hours at 350 deg then turn down to 300 for another hour or so, or until it is as tender as you would like.
In its first two years, the Outnet has held insane birthday sales that would basically give away incredible designer pieces worth over 1500 US dollars for… one dollar (or euro) plus shipping on the first birthday sale, and two dollars (or euros) with COST FREE shipping on the second birthday sale. This year they did not entertain us with a third lavish fashion party, no. Well, I must say I did get as lucky as hell with those mad giveaways. Of course I also did work hard for it: as in none of the cases the website announced the starting time of the sale, in both years I basically spent the night awake and set for running towards my computer the second I got their email announcing it was finally on. The first sale was on a first-come first served basis, and I was lucky to purchase a Miu Miu dress after less than 2 minutes had gone by from the moment I received their message containing the link to the sale. I spent the rest of the night trying hopelessly to score a second bargain, as the website basically crashed from all the incredible audience it got all at the same time. Second sale was more organized: they randomly distributed up to 2000 tickets to anyone who signed up for the sale. I signed up with about 100 emails. Yeps. Got two tickets which developed into a Calvin Klein Collection dress and an Alexander Wang winter coat. That’s a way to vamp up your closet!
(Edit: I forgot to add a photo of my daughter - doesn't she look darling and hardly seven months pregnant! In fact, that's not even a maternity dress!)
Judge Adrian Fulford said Mr Lubanga should be “freed without condition”, saying his detention was “no longer fair” after the trial was suspended.
H. L. Davis’s book is about the book I expected it would be based on its opening pages: a tale told by someone with very little native ability to edit themselves. Almost no moment can pass without a story—it’s not enough to tell me that, when Clay hears a bit of news, he looks surprised. I have to be told that his face looked as surprised as Old Man Simmons that night he found a polecat in his bed. You see, the polecat had gotten lost in the snow and had somehow climbed in the upstairs window, and into one of the nightgowns left behind by Simmons’s wife who had run off… Several sentences later, we’re back at Clay and ready to move forward until Davis can work out how to shoehorn in another little tale. These tales vary widely in their level of charm and wit. It reminds me a bit of old Nestor, Homer’s aging warrior who cannot admonish or exhort an Argive spearman without reference to some figure from the Greek Golden Age, except that all of Davis’s stories are about weird old men, usually experiencing some kind of physically injurious or romantically upsetting mishap, which tend to produce less awe-inspiring wonder than Nestor’s tales of Hercules, etc. Forget Nestor—let’s bring the analogy closer to home. It’s like being stuck at the table at your family reunion with your Uncle Melvin. There are worse tables to be stuck at (you can see your younger sister stuck at “the racist table”, and wouldn’t change places with her for $50), but you’re wondering how many more stories there can possibly be about Melvin’s dachshund, or the few apparently prank-filled months he spent at Fort Bragg 45 years ago. Sure, sometimes the dog story catches your fancy, or the tale of what he and “Crazy Eddie” did to the arrogant lieutenant’s jeep is humorous enough to pass the time. But not often enough for you to quite forgive your parents for insisting that you attend the family gathering.
8. One week closer to my school's Spring Break!
1) Warn your Franco-host that you've never had French cheese without offending them.
4. Without speaking, I freshened the front gardens with mulch, cut back some perennials, and felt the sun on my face. I paid close attention to my breathing, to the smell of the mulch, the feel of the ground beneath my feet, the texture of the soil, the weight of the garden fork in my hands.
This stress-avoidance strategy ultimately fails. The sloth causes increasing stress to all around him until no further help is available. Ultimately, he’ll face the stress of survival alone . . . and the void of a potential unfulfilled.
The passage suggests that there is no turning back for those with the Mark of the Beast. Perhaps a key reason for this is that the Mark of the Beast cannot be removed from a person’s body.
Sin City truly is the perfect moniker for Las Vegas. But lest one get carried into the fantasy land spun by TV ads featuring scantily clad nightclubbers or g-string-attired pool-goers, enormous lobsters and filet mignons at the ready, rather than Lust and Gluttony, I think Vegas is more rooted in the sins Sloth, Pride, and Envy.
Santorum: thanks Savannah
who gets a little anxious crawling through the final hole.
-HAMLET -- a novelistic reimagining by the amazing John Marsden. I haven't read this one, but based on what I've read of Marsden's stuff(everything else. A good fifteen books), it's bound to be bursting with compelling with characters, and strong writing.
Imagine the outrage if that story were to break.
Bitterness flowed up into my veins. I felt its grip in my jaw. It had been 6 days. It was supposed to be 3 and we were now at 6. Day 6 and my Yoo-hoo was gone.
At the time of writing the first version of this article YouTube wasn't even around. Nowadays, however, exploring her musical career has never been easier and I dropped most of the scans I had posted (and long lost again in Cyberspace) for YouTube clips.
I meditated on this latest deformity and realized that although I am fit and healthy in the broad sense of the term, I have a host of annoyances that are indicative of growing older. To wit:
When I, sitting, heard the astronomer, where he lectured with much applause in the lecture-room,
I'm not quite sure how any of them would feel about spending Christmas in a jar surrounded by fake snow and ornaments, let alone mica flakes? But I appreciate the beautiful reminder of their presence, and the story we tell each year.
The road to Fairview each morning is not a fun drive. The road is winding and littered with pot holes and suicidal deer. Coal miners who work at Loveridge mine drive in their trucks and get right on the back of your bumper until they find a place to pass you. Oh, there really isn’t a place to pass. But, they find one and give people coming in the opposite direction heart palpitations.
Oregon Trail uses some of the most fertile soil there is: desperation. Fear itself is too elevated an emotional state to keep up for very long, but desperation is more subtle and more sustainable. An added benefit is that when we're desperate, every emotional response is amplified - stretch a rubber band to its limit, and even a tiny scrape will snap it. This is the place where small problems (a snakebite) become heartbreaks, small victories (fording a river) become triumphs, a little humor (finding another player's tombstone) becomes an oasis in the desert, and a little fear finally becomes horror.
Drago killed Apollo Creed, Rocky’s best friend and fiercest competitor. Think of Creed as Joe Frazier and Rocky as Ali, only increase the hate by several magnitudes, remove friendship and add in race baiting between two of the most fiercely black men of their generation, and also vomit on yourself over any comparison between Stallone and Ali. What it comes down to is if anyone gets to kill Creed/Frazier, it’s Rocky/Ali. We don’t do any of this death by government sponsored proxy shit in the US of A, Drago. If our friends need to die, we’re the ones to beat them to death. So toss in temerity into Soviet Russia’s laundry list of crimes and misdemeanors.
It's been a long debate this riding the bus thing. Ella has looked forward to riding the bus since she was about three. For real. DH and I are not a fan of buses. I guess we just remember what we learned on the bus, and none of it was good. So we pretty much told her that she wouldn't be riding the bus to school and that mom or dad would drive her and pick her up every. single. day. all. year. Ufda.
Oh, and one more resolution: post a new book giveaway soon! Preferably this week!
Gaga opt to tame her usual blasphemous ways for the Judas music video and rather pays an homage and celebrate her catholic upbringing with the religious imagery rife music video. In fact in an recent interview with E!, the 25-year-old jokes about her directorial debut saying “In my opinion, the only controversial thing about this video is that I’m wearing Christian Lacroix and Chanel in the same frame”.
For cake:
For the Aromatics:
Just like Timothy, we continually find people infiltrating the Lord’s church who are more interested in pushing their own agendas than the promoting God’s “house-laws” (cf. 1 Tim. 1:3-4). Many of them are highly educated. Many of them have power, wealth, and authority. It can be very frightening to stand up to a man/woman of prominence who opposes true biblical teaching. However, it is completely unacceptable for us to allow fear to overwhelm us and do nothing. In this verse Paul gives us a three attributes that will help us overcome fear every time.
Cavanagh’s bills that would require the association to be subject to open meetings and freedom of information laws, introduced in mid-2011, are unlikely to advance in the Republican-led Michigan Legislature. Similar measures in past years have fizzled because the MCCA
In 2010, Herx learned that she suffered from a medical condition that caused infertility. At that time, she told her principal she needed time off for IVF treatment. Her request was granted and the principal allegedly told Herx: “You are in my prayers.”
Hadot repeatedly cites Plato’s notion that “Philosophy is an exercise in dying.” And all the schools of Greco-Roman antiquity took Socrates as model and founder, no matter how much they differed from the interpretation of Socrates put forward by Plato and his school. For the Stoics, the best way to reduce the way the passions will cloud our vision is to “prevision” what we are scared of, as a way of reducing its hold upon us. Contemporary cognitive-behavioral therapy advocates similar exercises to deal with anxiety, and psychodynamic talk therapies often involve probing into fears and worries by diving into them, and detailing for the therapist what one fears most as a way of conquering these fears.
This is why I hate public transport and flying - too many people, germs, no escape routes and no control.
for the first time in months & months.
Far from being irrelevant, laws of cause and effect are in operation.
Here is a picture of my card:
7.i think about you during the commercials
I go out every night and sleep all day
Frankly, I don’t see how anyone but God would consider justifying me. I was an atheist early in my life. What about Saul of Tarsus? He struck out against God’s servants. Yet God struck him down on the road to Damascus, and changed his heart. He became a great preacher of justification by faith. Such is our God, who is glorious in grace. Charles H. Spurgeon shares these thoughts on justification:
Or a devilish creature, at least.
Moody, slick, thick, seductive, sophisticated-yet-lowbrow auditory pleasures await YOU.
"That's what my sister said. My mom is already making little snippets about finding me a girlfriend."
To the voices inside my head
8. I had a segment produced on TV back in ... 2003 or so. I was an intern for the cable network TechTV. It was on blogs oddly enough. It was a fun experience.
I wonder how he will cope. How Karen and I as parents will help him through.
The missiles’ range was 500 miles.
Whatever Nietzsche’s faults were it would be unfair to ascribe to him the label of a “misogynist”. He was many things but never really that; certainly an overachiever, a fiercely intelligent yet impractical man, and yet “not a man” exactly but rather “dynamite”, someone who was “human, all too human” but also someone who was a romantic. Yep, a romantic. No one but a romantic could write that: “To put up with men, to keep open house in one’s heart – this is liberal, but no more than liberal. One knows of hearts which are capable of noble hospitality, which have curtained windows and closed shutters: they keep their best rooms empty. Why do they so? Because they await guests with whom one does not have to ‘put up’.” And I guess I too am a romantic because I too await a guest with whom I won’t have to “put up”. After all, love is mad like that but then there’s “always some reason in madness,” and I don’t think anyone would dare argue with that, not even Nietzsche.
Inks: Memento tuxedo black (Tsukineko)
When – 8 February – 4 July
Place – Space is made into place by a set of activities that happen in it. Places are processes: not fixed or frozen in time. There are lots of new practices relating to online interaction, for example: cocooning – individuals socializing less and retreating into their home, camping – finding a space to sit (e.g. in a library) and setting up your online workd, foot-printing – the route you take online. Some argue that in the technology world it is no longer possible to be ‘late’ because as soon as you start texting you can still participate. Specification of spaces have changed
Hope you’ve had a wonderful time, with family, or if you prefer to celebrate alone or with loved ones. I had a nice Christmas Eve with a couple of friends from work. And I ate fish and chips for dinner… I don’t know if it’s a step forward or a step backwards from last year, when I ate at Pizza Hut (also with some colleagues of mine).
5. Where is subplot of the refrigerator man going? Nick should have brought the quilt to Monroe for examination. There might have been a symbolic significance. Also, did the pie contain any potion? Am I too paranoid?
A showing of “agency” or “working in concert” is not required in order to establish a
recognize the need of those around me, that I may bring them hope, and inspire
Yes, that's right. A KIDS' DELUXE MANI-PEDI PACKAGE. At first, I was all like "Maybe they mean teenagers." But no, the Fine Print says "Must be 15 or under for children's option."
*Many larger churches offer Upward sports for the child who wants to play ball (basketball, soccer, baseball, flag football), but without all the competition (the focus is on good sportsmanship, developing new skills, and evangelism). There is a fee for Upward sports, but it is reasonable (and the time committment is less than with most city leagues).
What about those cooler games? Add tights and a long sleeve shirt (or even sweater) and your little one is good to go. And probably the best part of these dresses, is next year it can still be worn as a top!
49. Set rewards for those goals.
Mastodon is a good band, don’t get me wrong, but the praise this one has received –particularly the Grammy nomination –seems overblown, especially considering how great Crack the Skye was a couple years back (which makes this album just seem very standard in comparison). There are far too many superior metal acts from 2011 for me to let this slide without saying anything.
My marriage foundered on my partner’s inflexibility when it came to the idea of a man doing housework, and my exhaustion and resentment over having to do it all.
Although the owner of the farm, Mr du Plessis, had every right to call in the government troops to search for illegal firearms on his property, I get the general impression that Mr du Plessis’ true intentions were to get the couple off his farm. He thus utilized the free services of the State to achieve this purpose, purely because he needed the farmhouse for his own family.
I went to work and ignored the things I was supposed to do, but made an appointment at the little Take Care Clinic at Walgreens. It's easier than going to a real doctor, especially since I don't have a regular one.
Russian River Brewing Company Temptation
The pleasure is when you stop to help push a stranded car to the side of the road.
beat 1 pint double cream to a froth
I taught Myrte the art of stealing peoples drinks and hats. She was a good pupil. But then as we reached the centre the inevitable big group thing happened and we lost everyone we had come with. Oh well we would be fine by ourselves. We walked around the music stage and checked out beer prices. They were €2.50 here where as on the way in they were €1.50 so we decided to walk back. On the way Tina was hungry and we started eyeing up New York Pizza. We decide to buy some. Whilst they were waiting I went down the street and grabbed some beers. I came back and enjoyed the Pizza. It was very good. However something odd was happening, it appeared the pizza place was turning into some kind of dance off. It was very spontaneous and weird and Tina and Myrte decided to join in. I filmed the scene for your pleasure, but we decided to leave when some of the guys got a bit touchy feely.
Love dies not on the lips of the lovers.
Be still my heart! I'm having a love affair with all things spotted. There's just something so chic with classic black and white in polka dot form.
there is a peace to this slaughter.
The pants seem to be about say 3-4 inches below the normal
Once I got comfortable with these characters, the story flowed well. Everyone will soon be required to have a chip implanted behind their ear for identification purposes, but Aiden begins to suspect there's more to these devices. His father is the president of the company that is making the chips. Weird things happen -- Velvet realizes she has a chip, but she has no recollection of getting it. There are other sinister things at work here, but I don't really want to talk about more of the plot, so as not to give too much away.
APPROXIMATE TIME: 9am– 3am
Pour into prepared pan and spread into an even layer.
I became friends with many of the contestants, and casual acquaintances with others. (As Jeffrey Siger, one of the contestants said, it’s “sort of like the camaraderie born of battle or surviving a natural disaster: never to be taken as an endorsement of the event that engendered such strong ties among the the participants.”)
Each, new plain, a different color
We went to the backyard to find out where she was
What is the white you use on your trim and moldings?
I have a ton of writing to do. I am working on an adaptation of The Living is Easy by Dorothy West for The Goodman, as well as a play loosely about Tituba of Salem Village for La Jolla. And a play about parenthood for Denver Center Theater. As well as continuing working with Melia on adapting the book Common Ground for the stage. All the childcare needed for these endeavors is making me nervous...
Debt is killing France; the system is so rotten that like cancer, greedy bankers must be cut out of the system, they aren’t the solution; they are the problem.
My upcoming move to San Francisco has me thinking of a challenge that I faced a few years back. During my time in Halong Bay, in Vietnam, I decided on a whim to attempt rock climbing for the very first time. I met up with a crew of more experienced climbers on Cat Ba island, and, after receiving some basic instruction and getting properly equipped, I began climbing.
I care: far too much most of the time
In the context of multiculturalism, such treatment is about the invasion and occupation of an individual’s mind, so that he, like Winston, can behave and think in a way determined by the “race awareness facilitators”.
it. When Bluebeard returns and promises to cut her throat for the great female sin of inquisitiveness,
Today being the last day of our work week, I found myself with nothing to do during the last hour. And since it was a nice day out, and since I was a bit bored, I decided on a whim to indulge myself and correct the behavior of some of the violators that just get my blood to boiling--the lane-cutters.
Translating to medicine: who or what is to blame: the government’s and administrators’ ill-conceived policy decisions; the doctors who have rolled over and allowed these policies to infest medicine; the irresponsible and unreasonable patients who demand perfect care for free; or the culture that says irresponsibility and unreasonableness is acceptable?
As the world scrambles to sort out the current energy crisis, many countries are focusing efforts on reducing dependencies on foreign oil and fossil fuels. Prices continue to rise as supply is diminishing and we are now beginning to see the effects of their use on our planet. In this regard, Europe has always been ahead of the curve in terms of a “green movement”, and particularly Spain has always had a reputation for promoting environmental friendliness. Now, with crude oil futures fluctuating daily and gasoline prices doubling, we see an opportunity to introduce an affordable energy efficient hybrid engine smart car to the Spanish public.
and i hope you may find what you were searching in these lines just right infront of your eyes
What's your jam right now? What's lifting you up in the middle of February?
Some of you have asked about whether I was going to write about the events of this past week. And while I definitely will at some point, I’m just not able to do so in much detail yet. To take myself back into those moments and to reflect on the thoughts and emotions running through my mind and heart is just too overwhelming at this point. The sheer elevation change from a point of such extreme joy, with the birth of our healthy twin boys, to the lowest point of desperation I have ever felt in my life in just a few short hours was a shock to my system that I am not prepared to re-enter into, at least not yet. Those 72 hours felt like a bungee jump, at least what I imagine a bungee jump to feel like since the thought of actually doing that makes me pee in my pants a little bit. It felt much like a free fall that stopped just short of the concrete, swinging me back upwards, only to drop me again and again and again.
“Christian Endeavor is a watch
So,everything also by guessing and clicking everything to see what is it.
Local human rights NGO Suaram filed a civil suit with the French courts to look into the government's purchase of the submarines, in which kickbacks - which are illegal in France - running into millions of ringgit were said to have been paid.
When film director James Cameron was on The Colbert Report last month talking about his so-called “new” film, he told a story, with all seriousness (despite the venue), that Chinese authorities decided to cut out the nude scenes from Titanic 3D because with all the vivid effects, they’re afraid some male viewers will reach out to the screen and distract others from enjoying the movie. He then added, “This is true, you can’t make this up. This was the official statement.”
Poor women, Romney said, shouldn’t be given a choice, but instead should be required to work outside the home to receive Temporary Assistance for Needy Families benefits. “Even if you have a child 2 years of age, you need to go to work,”
After Nara prevents a bombing at Blue Ridge High, her ability to see the future starts to fade, while people at school are suddenly being injured at an unusually high rate.
This takeover occurred, weirdly, just two days after I finished a piece for Brewers Guardian on innovation and new product development. In that piece, I argued that the brand management culture of big companies is entirely different from the entrepreneurial spirit of smaller companies. One can manage and grow brands on a global scale, but is incapable of nurturing genuinely new ideas to market. The other is the opposite. If a big company really wants something fresh and new, the best way for them to get it is to buy it, once it's reached a point where it has proven to be a profitable and sustainable niche product that is ready to make the transition to something bigger. And if a small company wants to grow beyond that point, the best thing they can do is to sell to a company that has processes, channels and people in place who know how to do that.
I came across some beautiful images of girandoles.
Sorry I have not been around much this past week but the weather here in Scotland it taking making things difficult. Deliveries are not getting to us, power cuts and Internet connections playing up, and the long term forecast gives us no hope of seeing things change for many weeks. As I have been snowed in at the farm, the car is not so good on the slippy brea, the Internet has been a vital part of Christmas shopping, the amount of UK shopping now being done online is as high as its ever been, helped only by the weather and the reluctance to battle your way into town to only have a bigger battle in the shops to get what you need. Sit back, type it in and wait for the poor postie to bring it right to your door. Way to go!
Does anyone else feel like it’s OCCUPY MY GENITALS time when they call up a service rep? Just curious. Just lookin’ for some good, old fashioned Kumbayah.
Rich in diversity, this city, these museums, and its people invite the tourist to return over a lifetime, again and again.
Shabana Azmi: Watching Aamir Khans TV show on female foeticide. SUPERB. Bravo Aamir.. What a huge service u r doing. Bless u. Jeete Raho. Khush raho. Aamir Khans show can bring a revolution. Thoroughly researched covers all aspects touches emotional chord n forces us to reexamine ourselves
This isn’t always a bad thing, though. I never gave up on this little piece of dystopian lit. I changed it more times than I care to admit and I neglected it for a long period of time (“isn’t period of time” kind of redundant? My friend and I had this discussion a long time ago and we never came to a conclusion), but I never completely abandoned it, like I have a lot of other stories.
Brazilian financial market analysts and economists reduced their 2012 average inflation forecast for the eighth consecutive week, according to a market survey published by the Central Bank of Brazil Monday.
I have to remember to post this macaroni salad recipe, a simple one, since it was a big hit at my Memorial Day BBQ. By the way, I turned 50 last week, and wanted to thank many of you for your Birthday Wishes you passed my way...I am in the club now!
Larry Bowman, 46, New York, N.Y.
In 1963, Allan Sherman released—two different versions of "The Twelve Gifts of Christmas," in which the gifts are tacky early 1960s items, such as a cheaply-made Japanese transistor radio. Also that year, Alvin and the Chipmunks covered the song for their album Christmas with The Chipmunks, Vol. 2, in which they grow tired in the middle and accidentally flub on the eleventh day.
From forever21 yesterday (I love getting packages in the mail!) and decided a Saturday would be a good day to wear them. Shorts are kind of small but do-able.
But if you have to lose your mind… that’s the way to go!
That boy the heroine bumps into is obviously a handsome action-hero in waiting. He'll protect her, and of course they'll fall in love!
Last night I participated in a memorial ride and ghost bike dedication. Some of the nearly 300 cyclists I know very well, some are colleagues, some have been on the same rides with me, some I count as friends…most were complete strangers. What brought us all together was the senseless death of a young man at the hands of a hit-and-run driver. A coward that still remains at large.
I’m not sure how long it will last, but for now, it is the best thing. If you could have seen Siena’s face. What I would call Our Greenhouse Effect. As big of a smile than during her swim meet. She’s our gardener here at home and this was the best gift we could have given her, and we all enjoy being outside too, and working together in our garden makes it even more fun!
Yes we certainly can, but in order to do so, we need to define what our goals are. What is it that we want to achieve? Many people are still divided on this issue. Some say we should push for an independent homeland for ourselves in the Cape, some say the entire South Africa is ours already. Some want the old Boer Republics reinstated. Some wants to rule alongside blacks in a type of Federation. Some whites simply want to leave.
Common - 39
action to protect consumers, especially
– Caravaggio Meets Fight Club: Tarsem’s Vision
They listen up, downstate, in the asylum.
and float on to Chicago.
SEC. 2. Time for filing; extension.—The petition shall be filed within fifteen (15) days from notice of the judgment or final order or resolution appealed from, or of the denial of the petitioner’s motion for new trial or reconsideration filed in due time after notice of the judgment. On motion duly filed and served, with full payment of the docket and other lawful fees and the deposit for costs before the expiration of the reglementary period, the Supreme Court may for justifiable reasons grant an extension of thirty (30) days only within which to file the petition.
has offices in Paris and in New York City. This
If you have to see to believe, it ceases to be faith. Paul adds to this in 2 Corinthians5: 7, “(For we walk by faith, not by sight).” The fact that Gideon had to have the fleece out showed his unbelief. I am bold now to quote from Romans 14:23. “For whatsoever is not of faith is sin.”
and protect it without having to blink,
3 vital
Very few people know about the Bernstein case and its continuing application to Nazi-looted art cases. U.S. museums have taken the position that Hitler's acts of stripping German museums of Jewish and "degenerate" artworks should be considered legitimate governmental acts in a bid to hold onto artworks stolen from German museums.
I now know, I can’t look back. There’s a hymn, one of my favorites, that goes like this:
This is no high-speed thriller, but an intelligent crime story with real depth. Operating within a complex and exciting plot, the characters hold genuine interest in their own right and ensure that further stories in the series will be eagerly read.
and decode your eyes.
Jennifer is a single mother in her forties and has children aged 4, 13 and 18. She home schools her younger children and her 18 year old daughter is the magazine’s photographer and subeditor.
which means there's only one left.... and who could it be except the incomparable hotness known as...
to take me to your rainbow
I started running last July and decided if I made it to Christmas it was what I wanted to put on my list. I LOVE THIS THING!
As most of my readers are aware, I am part of a tight online mom community that branched off from a much larger message board about pregnancy and babies. This community (GPM) is made up of about 100 beautiful ladies who have supported each other through trying to conceive, getting pregnant, pregnancy losses, and the struggles and triumphs of raising babies. We have gotten to know each other on a very personal level and I don't know what I would do without my "mamas" to consult on all matters of pregnancy and parenting.
They are really excited because their group has double the boys than girls.
My purposes are:
The likes are much harder to parse into simple groups. I find the times when I am most aware of how much I love my children come in unpredictable and irrational bursts. Sometimes it’s when they are wandering around drowsily after first waking up from a nap. Other times it’s when I watch them happily work on something together. I also really enjoy hearing them laugh uncontrollably and seeing the pride they feel when they are suddenly able to do something new.
Apart from the traditional Pushkin Foundation, offering Russian classes and many other activities, a new Russian Center has been opened in Atocha St. a few months ago. This place intends to be a new exchange point and learning resource for those interested in the Slavic culture.
PATRIOT
